<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89804-0017 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-04-89.f2.A1016</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 149 / Friday, August 4, 1989 /Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVlCES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18"> Office of Child Support Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">45 CFR Parts 232, 301, 302, 303, 304, 306, and 307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0970-AA16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Standards for Program Operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE)/FSA/HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final regulation implements the requirements ofsections 121 and 122 of the Family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485)by revising current regulations to specify standards for processing childsupport enforcement cases and timeframes for distributing child supportcollections under title IV-D of the Social Security Act (the Act). By imposingrequirements and timeframes for taking appropriate actions and clarifyingor updating existing or vague timeframes and requirements, the regulationwould ensure that child support services are effectively and expeditiouslyprovided and that children receive the services they need and the supportto which they are entitled. States are required to meet these standardsby October 1, 1990. In addition, this regulation implements sections 103(e)(3) and 127 of theFamily Support Act of 1988 by revising regulations to exclude certain costsfrom administrative costs when computing incentive payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>October 1, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Joyce Allred, Policy and PlanningDivision, OCSE (202) 252-5369.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>Public reporting burden for the collections of information requirementsat 45 CFR 302.32(b), 303.2(b), 303.2(c), 303.4(e), 303.5(c), 303.6(c)(3),303.6(c)(4), 303.11(c) and 303.11(d) is estimated to average 5, 5, 5, 5,5, 5, 5, 5, and 5 minutes respectively, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed and completing and reviewing the collection of information.Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to the Office of Child Support Enforcement, Family Support Administration,370 L'Enfant Promenade, SW., Washington, DC 20447; and to the Office ofInformation and Regulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington,DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Since the inception of the Child Support Enforcement (IV-D) program in1975, States have been required to locate absent parents, establish paternity,obtain support orders and collect support payments. However, despite Federaland State efforts in the 13 years since the inception of the IV-D program,the child support problem continues to grow. On October 13, 1988, the FamilySupport Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485) was signed into law. This new lawaddresses the injustice of parents failing to assume responsibility fortheir children's support. Section 121 of Public Law 100-485 requires theSecretary of Health and Human Services (HHS) to establish time limits withinwhich States must accept and respond to requests for assistance in establishingand enforcing support orders, including requests to locate absent parents,establish paternity and initiate proceedings to establish and collect supportawards. Section 121(b) requires the establishment of an advisory committeewith which the Secretary must consult prior to issuing any regulationsestablishing standards. Section 122 of Public Law 100-485 requires theSecretary of HHS to establish time limits governing the period within whicha State must distribute amounts collected as child support.Based on the analysis of Federal program audit and program review results,input from State IV-D agencies, early discussions with experts in childsupport enforcement case processing and program operations and recommendationsof the advisory committee mandated by section 121, we developed standardsset forth in this regulation which should ensure appropriate and expeditiousprocessing of IV-D cases. States must meet the standards for case processingcontained in this final rule as one facet of the determination of whetherthey are in substantial compliance with the requirements of Title IV-Dof the Act. We believe the standards are realistic and focused in areaswhere increased effectiveness and efficiency are necessary for an enhancedIV-D program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory Authority</ITAG>This regulation is published under the authority of sections 452 (a)(1)and (a)(2), (h) and (i), 454(13), 458(d) and 1102 of the Act. Sections 452(a) (1) and (2) require the Secretary to establish such standardsfor State programs for locating absent parents, establishing paternity,and obtaining child support as he determines to be necessary to assurethat such programs will be effective, and to establish minimal organizationaland staffing requirements for State units engaged in carrying out suchprograms. Section 452(h) of the Act, added by section 121 of Public Law100-485, requires the Secretary to establish time limits governing theperiod or periods within which a State must accept and respond to requestsfor assistance in establishing and enforcing support orders, includingrequests to locate absent parents, establish paternity, and initiate proceedingsto establish and collect child support awards. Section 452(i) of the Act,added by section 122 of Public Law 100-485, requires the Secretary to establishtime limits governing the period or periods within which a State must distributeamounts collected as child support. Section 454(13) of the Act requiresStates to comply with such requirements and standards as the Secretaryof HHS determines to be necessary for the establishment of an effectiveIV-D program. Section 458(d) of the Act, as amended by section 127 of PublicLaw 100-485, requires States to exclude for purposes of computing incentives,the amounts expended by the State in carrying out a special project assistedunder section 455(e) of the Act. Section 1102 of the Act requires the Secretaryto publish regulations that may be necessary for the efficient administrationof the functions for which he is responsible under the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Provisions </ITAG>This regulation prescribes standards for program operations which the IV-Dagency must meet, including minimal organizational and staffing requirements,and requirements governing: maintenance of case records; location of absentparents; establishment of support obligations; establishment of paternity;service of process; enforcement of support obligations; conditions underwhich cases may be closed; distribution of support payments; and incentivepayments. In addition, this regulation makes technical changes and addsnew sections for clarity and consistency with the above-mentioned changesto parts 302 and 303. States are required to meet these standards by October1, 1990. Changes with respect to excluding costs of interstate grants when computingincentives would be effective January 1, 1990, and changes with respectto excluding costs of demonstration projects on model procedures for reviewingchild, support awards are effective when the costs are incurred. Treatment of Child Support Collections Made in the Child Support EnforcementProgram as Income and Resources in the Title IV-A Program_Section 232.20Section 232.20(d) requires that the Aid to Families with Dependent Children(IV-A) agency, on behalf of the IV-D agency, must pay to the family thesum disregarded under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) within 20 calendar days ofthe date of initial receipt in the State of the first $50 of support collectedin a month, or, if less than $50 of support is collected in a month, within20 calendar days of the end of the month in which the support is collected.Collection and Distribution of Support Payments by the IV-D Agency_Section302.32 Section 302.32 is revised to reduce the time within which IV-D agenciesmust report collections to IV-A agencies and to add specific timeframesfor distribution of collections in both AFDC and non-AFDC cases to helpensure that child support collections reach the intended recipients asexpeditiously as possible. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(b)_Informing the IV-A Agency of Collections </ITAG>Section 302.32(b) requires that the IV-D agency inform the State's IV-Aagency of the amount of the collection which represents payment on therequired support obligation for the month, as determined in andSection; 302.51(a),within 10 working days of the end of the month in which the support isreceived by the agency responsible for final distribution. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(f)_Timeframes for Distribution of Amounts Collected</ITAG>1. <T3>Section 302.32(f)(1)_Timeframes for distribution of amounts collectedin interstate IV-D cases.</T3> Paragraph andSection; 302.32(f)(1) requiresthat in interstate IV-D cases, amounts collected by the responding Stateon behalf of the initiating State must be forwarded to the initiating Statewithin 15 calendar days of the initial point of receipt in the respondingState, in accordance with andSection; 303.7(c)(7)(iv). 2. <T3>Section 302.32(f)(2)_Timeframes for distribution of collections. </T3>Paragraph(f)(2)(i) requires that, if the IV-D agency sends payments to the AFDCfamily under andSection; 302.51(b)(1), payments must be sent to the familywithin 15 calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State ofthe first $50 of support collected in a month, or, if less than $50 iscollected in a month, within 15 calendar days of the end of the month inwhich the support was collected. When the IV-A agency sends payments tothe family under andSection; 302.51(b)(1), the IV-D agency must forward anyamount due the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) to the IV-A agency within15 calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State of the first$50 collected in a month, or, if less than $50 is collected in a month,within 15 calendar days of the end of the month in which the support wascollected. Paragraph (f)(2)(ii) requires that, except as specified under paragraph(f)(2)(iv), collections for the month after the month the family receivesits last assistance payment and collections distributed under andSection;302.51(b) (3) and (5) of this part must be sent to the family within 25calendar days of initial receipt in the State of a collection for the firstmonth of ineligibility. Paragraph (f)(2)(iii) requires that except as specified in paragraph (f)(2)(iv)of this section, collections in title IV-E foster care cases under andSection;302.52(b) (2) and (4) of this part must be distributed within 15 calendardays of the date of initial receipt in the State. Paragraph (f)(2)(iv) requires that collections as a result of Federal orState income tax refund offset paid to the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(5)of this part or distributed in title IV-E foster care cases under andSection;302.52(b)(4) of this part, must be sent to the AFDC family or IV-E agency,as appropriate, within 30 calendar days of the date of initial receiptby the IV-D agency, unless State law requires a post-offset appeal process.In this instance, if an appeal is filed timely, the IV-D agency must sendany payment to the AFDC family or IV-E agency within 15 calendar days ofthe date the appeal is resolved. 3. <T3>Section 302.32(f)(3)_Timeframes for distribution of amounts collectedon behalf of non-AFDC individuals. </T3>To ensure timely distribution ofamounts collected on behalf of individuals receiving services under andSection;302.33, section 302.32(f)(3) sets forth timeframes within which Statesmust distribute collections on behalf of non-AFDC families. Under andSection; 302.32(f)(3)(i), amounts collected which represent paymenton the current support obligation must be paid to the family within 15calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State. Paragraph (f)(3)(ii) adds a timeframe to current policy by requiring that,except as specified in paragraph (f)(3)(iii), if the amount collected ismore than the amount required to be distributed in paragraph (f)(3)(i)discussed above, the State may, at its discretion, either opt to send suchamounts to the family to satisfy non-AFDC past-due support within 15 calendardays of the date of initial receipt in the State or retain such amountsas have been assigned to satisfy past assistance paid to the family whichhas not been reimbursed.Paragraph (f)(3)(iii) requires that collections due the family under andSection;302.51(b)(5) as a result of Federal or State income tax refund offset besent to the family within 30 calendar days of the date of receipt in theIV-D agency, except: if State law requires a post-offset appeal processand an appeal is filed timely, in which case the IV-D agency must sendany payment to the family within 15 calendar days of the date the appealis resolved; or as provided in andSection; 303.72(h) (5) of this chapter.Since timeframes for distribution of all IV-D collections, regardless ofthe collection mechanism, (e.g., Federal or State income tax refund offset,wage withholding, etc.) are governed by andSection; 302.32(f), referenceto timeliness of distribution in other regulations is unnecessary. Accordingly,andSection; 302.51 is amended by deleting in paragraph (a) the last sentencethat reads ``In any case in which collections are received by an entityother than the agency responsible for final distribution under this section,the entity must transmit the collections within 10 days of receipt'' andby deleting in paragraphs (b)(3) and (5) the sentence that reads ``Thispayment shall be made in the month following the month in which the amountof the collection was used to redetermine eligibility for an assistancepayment under the State's title IV-A plan''. Similarly, andSection; 303.100(e)(2)is amended to delete reference to distributing ``promptly'' amounts collectedthrough wage or income withholding. Finally, we are deleting from regulationsgoverning distribution of State tax refund offset collections the words``Within a reasonable time period in accordance with State law'' in andSection;303.102(g)(1). Establishment of Cases and Maintenance of Case Records_Section 303.2 1. <T3>Application Process. </T3>Section 303.2(a)(1) requires that the IV-Dagency must make applications for child support services readily accessibleto the public. Section 303.2(a)(2) requires that when an individual requests an applicationor IV-D services, the IV-D agency must provide applications on the dayan individual makes a request in person, or send an application to theindividual within no more than 5 working days of a written or telephonerequest for services. In addition, information describing available services,the individual's rights and responsibilities and the State's fees, costrecovery and distribution policies must accompany all applications forservices and must be provided to AFDC, Medicaid and title IV-E foster careapplicants or recipients within no more than 5 working days of referralto the IV-D agency. Paragraph (a)(3) requires that the IV-D agency must accept an applicationas filed on the day it and the application fee are received. An applicationis a written document provided by the State which indicates that the individualis applying for child support enforcement services under the State's titleIV-D program and is signed by the individual applying for IV-D services.2. <T3>Opening cases. </T3>Section 303.2(b) requires that, for all cases referredto the IV-D agency or applying for IV-D services under andSection; 302.33,the IV-D agency must, within no more than 20 calendar days of receipt ofreferral of a case or filing an application for services, open a case byestablishing a case record, and based on an assessment of the case to determinenecessary action: solicit necessary and relevant information from the custodialparent and other relevant sources and initiate verification of information,if appropriate; and, if there is inadequate location information to proceedwith a case, request additional information or refer the case for furtherlocation attempts as specified in andSection; 303.3. Location of Absent Parents_Section 303.3 1. <T3>Definition. </T3>Section 303.3(a) defines ``location'' as informationconcerning the physical whereabouts of the absent parent or the absentparent's employer(s), other sources of income, or assets, as appropriate,which is sufficient and necessary to take the next appropriate action ina case.2. <T3>Location sources. </T3>Section 303.3(b)(1) requires the IV-D agencyto use appropriate Federal, interstate and local location sources and touse appropriate State agencies and departments as authorized by State law.Paragraph (b)(2) requires that States establish working relationships withall appropriate agencies in order to utilize locate resources effectively.3. <T3>Actions required within 75 calendar days. </T3>Paragraph (b)(3) requiresthat the IV-D agency, within no more than 75 calendar days of determiningthat location is necessary, access all appropriate location sources, includingthe Federal PLS, and ensure that location information is sufficient totake the next appropriate action on a case. Paragraph (b)(4) requires that the IV-D agency refer appropriate casesto the IV-D agency of any other State, in accordance with the requirementsof andSection; 303.7 of this part. To correspond with this requirement, andSection;303.7(b)(2) requires that the initiating State refer any interstate caseto the responding State's central registry for action within 20 calendardays of determining the absent parent or putative father is in anotherState. The IV-D agency of the other State must follow the procedures inparagraphs (b) (1) through (5) for such cases, as necessary, except thatthe responding State is not required to access the Federal PLS under paragraph(b)(3). 4. <T3>Continued location attempts. </T3>Paragraph (b)(5) requires that theIV-D agency periodically repeat location attempts in cases in which previousattempts to locate absent parents or sources of income and/or assets havefailed, but adequate identifying and other information exists to meet requirementsfor submittal for location. Attempts must be repeated quarterly, or immediatelyupon receipt of new information which may aid in location, whichever occurssooner. Quarterly attempts may be limited to automated sources but mustinclude accessing State employment security files. Repeated attempts becauseof new information must meet the requirements in paragraph (b)(3). Paragraph (b)(6) requires that at least annually, States must submit tothe Federal PLS cases in which location is needed and previous attemptsto locate have failed and which meet the requirements for submittal tothe Federal PLS. Paragraph (c) requires that the State must establish guidelines definingdiligent efforts to serve process. These guidelines must include periodicallyrepeating service of process attempts in cases in which previous attemptsto serve process have failed, but adequate identifying and other informationexists to attempt service of process. Establishment of Support Obligations_Section 303.4 Section 303.4(d) requires the IV-D agency, within 90 calendar days of locatingthe absent parent or of establishing paternity, to establish an order forsupport, or complete service of process necessary to establish a supportorder (or document unsuccessful attempts to serve process, in accordancewith the State's guidelines defining diligent efforts under andSection; 303.3(c)).To correspond with the requirement in paragraph (d), andSection; 303.101(b)(2)states that actions to establish or enforce support obligations in IV-Dcases must be completed from the time of successful service of processto the time of disposition with the required timeframes. Section 303.4(e) requires that in situations where a support order is dismissedwithout prejudice, the IV-D agency must, at the time of the dismissal,examine the reasons for dismissal and determine when it would be appropriateto seek an order in the future, and seek a support order at that time.Establishment of Paternity_Section 303.5 1. <T3>Paternity establishment process timeframe. </T3>Section 303.5(a)(1)requires that the IV-D agency, within no more than 90 calendar days oflocating the alleged father, file for paternity establishment or completeservice of process to establish paternity (or document unsuccessful attemptsto serve process in accordance with the State's guidelines defining diligentefforts under andSection; 303.3(c)), whichever occurs later in accordancewith the State's procedures for paternity establishment. Under paragraph(a)(2), paternity must be established or the alleged father excluded asa result of genetic tests and/or legal process within one year of the laterof: (i) Successful service of process; or, (ii) the child reaching 6 monthsof age. Paragraph (a)(3) requires that, in any case where an alleged father isexcluded but more than one alleged father has been identified, the IV-Dagency must meet the requirements set forth in paragraphs (a) (1) and (2)for each alleged father identified. 2. <T3>Use of laboratories which perform genetic testing at competitive rates.</T3>Paragraph (c) requires that the IV-D agency identify and use throughcompetitive procurement laboratories which perform, at reasonable cost,legally and medically acceptable genetic tests which tend to identify thefather or exclude the alleged father. The IV-D agency must make availablea list of such laboratories to appropriate courts and law enforcement officials,and to the public upon request. To correspond with these changes, andSection; 304.20(b)(2) is revised bychanging the reference to blood tests to genetic tests and the referenceto andSection; 303.5(b) to andSection; 303.5(c). Enforcement of Support Obligations_Section 303.6 This final regulation revises andSection; 303.6 by deleting the enforcementtechniques listed in paragraphs (a) through (f) and adding monitoring andenforcement requirements in new paragraphs (a) through (c). 1. <T3>Monitoring compliance with orders and identifying delinquencies. </T3>SectionandSection; 303.6(a) requires that the IV-D agency maintain and use an effectivesystem for monitoring compliance with the support obligation. This monitoringincludes monitoring of all provisions of support orders, including healthinsurance for the child(ren).Additionally, paragraph (b) requires that the IV-D agency maintain anduse an effective system for identifying those cases in which there is afailure to comply with the support obligation on the date the parent failsto make payments in an amount equal to the support payable for one monthor earlier in accordance with State law.2.<T3> Enforcement actions.</T3> Paragraph (c)(1) requires that the Stateinitiate wage withholding in accordance with the requirements of andSection;303.100. Paragraph (c)(2) requires that the State take any appropriateenforcement action (except income withholding, and Federal and State incometax refund offset) unless service of process is necessary, within no morethan 30 calendar days of identifying a delinquency or other support-relatednon-compliance with the order, or location of the absent parent, whicheveroccurs later. If service of process is necessary prior to taking an enforcementaction, the IV-D agency must complete such service (or document unsuccessfulattempts to serve process in accordance with the State's guidelines definingdiligent efforts under andSection; 303.3(c)) and take the enforcement action,if process is served, within no more than 60 calendar days of identifyinga delinquency or other support-related non-compliance with the order, orlocation of the absent parent, whichever occurs later.This requirement includes taking appropriate enforcement action withinthe above timeframes upon notification of non-compliance with an orderrequiring health insurance coverage. In accordance with current medicalsupport requirements, States must attempt to enforce a requirement in asupport order that an absent parent obtain health insurance in cases ofnon-compliance with such an order.With regard to Federal and State income tax refund offset, paragraph (c)(3)requires that States submit all cases which meet the certification requirementsfor State tax refund offset once a year, in accordance with andSection; 303.102and State guidelines developed under andSection; 302.70(b), and for Federaltax refund offset in accordance with andSection; 303.72.Paragraph (c)(4) requires that in cases in which enforcement attempts havebeen unsuccessful, the State must, at the time an attempt to enforce fails,examine the reason the enforcement attempt failed and determine when itwould be appropriate to take an enforcement action in the future, and takean enforcement action at that time.Because of the changes discussed above, we deleted the list of enforcementtechniques in former andSection; 303.6 (a) through (f). There is no reasonto list some enforcement actions or to try to list all techniques sinceStates are required to take whatever enforcement action is warranted ina particular case.Procedures for Case Assessment and Prioritization_Section 303.10Section 303.10(a) requires that, if a State adopts a case assessment andprioritization system, the IV-D agency must continue to meet the timeframesand case processing standards contained in part 303.Section 303.10(b)(5) requires a State, in implementing a case assessmentand prioritization system, to prioritize cases after reviewing all intakeinformation for accuracy and completeness and, if review indicates thatadditional information is needed, prioritize only after attempting to verifyor secure the information. A cross reference to andSection; 303.2 is addedto andSection; 303.10(b)(5) to ensure that cases are prioritized only afterthe requirements for establishment of cases and maintenance of case recordsin andSection; 303.2 are met.Finally, we are tying the case processing requirements in part 303 to therequirement for periodic review of low priority cases contained in andSection;303.10(b)(6). Paragraph (b)(6) is amended to require that periodic reviewof low priority cases must be in accordance with the standards set forthin part 303, such as quarterly location attempts and diligent efforts toeffect service of process.Case Closure Criteria_Section 303.11Section 303.11 establishes criteria States must use to determine whetherchild support cases may be closed. If a case does not meet at least oneof the following criteria, it must be kept open and worked. However, becausecurrent regulations at andSection; 303.10 allow States to establish proceduresfor case prioritization, States may distinguish between those cases withcurrent success potential and those which do not now, but may in the future,have potential for success. This latter group could include the cases whichdo not meet the criteria for closure but in which the next required caseprocessing step cannot as yet be taken. Requirements for periodic reviewin andSection; 303.10 governing case prioritization systems, and elsewherein part 303, would apply in these cases.Section 303.11 is entitled ``Case closure criteria.'' Paragraph (a) requiresStates to establish a system for case closure. Paragraph (b) establishesthe criteria for case closure eligibility.Paragraph (b)(1) allows closure of a case where the child has reached theage of majority, there is no longer a current support order, and eitherno arrearages are owed or arrearages are under $500 or unenforceable underState law.Paragraph (b)(2) allows case closure where the child has not reached theage of majority, arrearages are less than $500 or unenforceable under Statelaw, and there is no longer a current support order. Paragraph (b)(3) allows a State to close a case upon the death of the absentparent, or putative father, if no further action, including a levy againstthe estate, can be taken. Paragraph (b)(4) states that the IV-D agency may close cases in which,either the child is at 1east 18 years old and the action is barred by astatute of limitations which meets the requirements of andSection; 302.70(a)(5),or a genetic test or court or administrative process has excluded the putativefather and no other putative father can be identified. In addition, paragraph(b)(4) specifies that, in accordance with andSection; 303.5(b), the IV-Dagency need not attempt to establish paternity in any case involving incestor forcible rape, or in any case where legal proceedings for adoption arepending, if, in the opinion of the IV-D agency, it would not be in thebest interests of the child to establish paternity. Paragraph (b)(5) allows case closure where the IV-D agency has been unableto locate an absent parent despite having made repeated location effortsusing multiple sources, including those listed under andSection; 303.3, overa three-year period. Paragraph (b)(6) allows case closure if the absent parent cannot pay supportfor the duration of the child's minority because the parent has been institutionalizedin a psychiatric facility, is incarcerated with no chance for parole, orhas a medically-verified total and permanent disability with no evidenceof support potential. The State must also determine that no income or assetsare available to the absent parent which could be levied or attached forsupport. Paragraph (b)(7) allows a case to be closed when the absent parent is acitizen of, and lives in, a foreign country, does not work for the UnitedStates government or a company which has its headquarters or offices inthe U.S., and has no reachable domestic income or assets; and the Statehas been unable to establish reciprocity with the country. Paragraph (b)(8) allows a case to be closed if the resident parent, legalguardian, attorney, or agent of a child only requested the State parentlocator service (PLS) to submit a request to the Federal PLS under theprovisions of andSection; 302.35(c)(3) and the location services have beencompleted. Paragraph (b)(9) allows case closure in a non-AFDC case or in a formerAFDC, Medicaid or foster care (title IV-E) case when the custodial parentrequests that the case be closed and there are no arrearages assigned tothe State. Paragraph (b)(10) allows the IV-D agency to close a case when it has beennotified by the IV-A or IV-E agency, in accordance with andSection; 302.31(c),that there has been a finding of good cause for the recipient's failureto cooperate in obtaining support and the IV-A or IV-E agency has determinedthat paternity establishment or support establishment and enforcement maynot proceed without risk or harm to the child or caretaker relative. Paragraph (b)(11) allows case closure in non-AFDC cases if the IV-D agencyis unable to contact the custodial parent over at least a 30-calendar dayperiod despite attempts to contact the parent by both phone and letter,including at least one registered letter. Paragraph (b)(12) allows case closure due to non-cooperation of the custodialparent when the State documents both the circumstances of the non-cooperationand that an action by the custodial parent is essential for the next stepin providing support enforcement services. Paragraph (c) requires the State, 60 calendar days prior to any case closurebecause of criteria in paragraphs (b)(1) through (7) and (11) and (12),to notify the custodial parent in writing of the State's intent to closethe case. The case must be left open if the custodial parent supplies informationin response to the notice which could lead to the establishment of paternityor a support order or enforcement of an order or re-establishes contactwith the agency in the case of paragraph (b)(11). If a case is closed,the custodial parent may request at a later date that the case be reopenedif there is a change in circumstances which could lead to the establishmentof paternity or a support order, or enforcement of an order. Paragraph (d) requires the IV-D agency to retain all records for casesclosed pursuant to this section for a minimum of three years, in accordancewith 45 CFR part 74, subpart D. Minimal Organizational and Staffing Requirements_Section 303.20 Section 303.20(c), Minimal organizational and staffing requirements, requiresthat there must be an organizational structure and sufficient resourcesat the State or local level to meet the performance and time standardscontained in Part 303 and to provide for the administration or supervisionof support enforcement functions listed in paragraphs (c)(1) through (8).Paragraph (c)(7) is revised to state that the activities to enforce collectionof support must include wage withholding and other available enforcementtechniques. To further ensure effective child support programs, a new paragraph (g)is added which states that, if it is determined as a result of an auditunder Part 305 that a State is not in substantial compliance with titleIV-D of the Act, the Secretary will evaluate whether inadequate resourceswas a major contributing factor and, if necessary, may set resource standardsfor the State. Incentive Payments to States and Political Subdivisions_Section 303.52and Proposed Section 304.12 Because regulations for incentive payments, for the most part, govern afinancial aspect of the program and do not therefore properly belong inPart 303, which establishes program standards, andSection; 303.52(a), (b)and (c) are transferred to 45 CFR Part 304, Federal Financial Participation.Accordingly, current 45 CFR 303.52(d) is being redesignated as andSection;303.52. Furthermore, the section title, Incentive payments to States andpolitical subdivisions, is changed to Pass-through of incentives to politicalsubdivisions, since this is the only requirement remaining in this section.To implement the provisions of sections 103(e) and 127 of Pub. L. 100-485,regulations governing incentive payments are amended in two ways. First,to implement section 127, which amends section 458(d) of the Act to excludethe costs of interstate grants when computing incentive payments, paragraph(b)(4)(v) is revised to state that, effective January 1, 1990, in calculatingthe amount of incentive payments, amounts expended by the State in carryingout a special project under section 455(e) of the Act shall not be includedin the State's total IV-D administrative costs. In addition, to implementsection 103(e) of Pub. L. 100-485, a new paragraph (vi) is added whichstates that the costs of demonstration projects for evaluating model proceduresfor reviewing child support awards under section 103(e) of Pub. L. 100-485shall not be included in a State's total IV-D administrative costs forpurposes of computing incentives. For consistency with the redesignation of most of andSection; 303.52 as andSection;304.12, all references to andSection; 302.52(a) through (c) in other regulationsare changed to refer to andSection; 304.12.Medical Support Enforcement_Part 306 Previously, Part 306 was divided into two Subparts. Subpart A containedrequirements governing optional cooperative agreements and Subpart B containedrequired IV-D medical support activities. The requirements under currentSubpart B (andSection; 306.50, Securing medical support information, andandSection; 306.51, Securing medical support obligations) are moved to Part303, redesignated as andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31, respectively.The regulations under current Subpart A remain as Part 306 without theheading of Subpart A. For consistency with the changes and redesignations within Part 306, allreferences in program regulations to regulations in current Part 306 arechanged to reflect the transfer of the contents of Subpart B to Part 303and the redesignation of Subpart A of Part 306 as Part 306. <ITAG tagnum="84">Response to Comments </ITAG>We received comments on the notice of proposed rulemaking from over 150commenters representing national organizations, State and local IV-D agencies,child advocacy groups, and private citizens. Comments and our responsesare as follows. Effective Date of Requirements and Corresponding Audit Standards 1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received many comments on the proposed effective dateof these requirements. The preponderance of commenters indicated that theycould not meet the timeframes without Statewide and comprehensive automatedinformation management systems. These commenters urged that the effectivedate for timeframes be tied to such a level of automation. Some suggestedthat the timeframes not be effective until October 1, 1995, when Statesare required by the Family Support Act of 1988 to have operational automatedchild support enforcement systems in place, or even until one or two yearsafter that date. One State with an automated support enforcement systemrequested, for example, that timeframes be phased in as part of a State'sresponsibilities to have automated systems in place by 1995, arguing thatin their own situation, modification of State law and regulations as wellas change to current system processing methods would be necessary. Othersasked that implementation be delayed until two or three years after publicationof the final rules, as opposed to the October 1, 1990 date set forth inthe proposed rule. Some commenters suggested a phase-in of timeframes between October of 1990and October of 1995. One suggestion was that new IV-D cases be subjectto the timeframes in 1991 and existing IV-D cases become subject to thetimeframes in 1996. Others suggested that more liberal requirements beeffective in 1992 (suggesting double the proposed timeframes for each action)and the proposed timeframes be effective in 1993. Still others suggestedimplementing timeframes one at a time or letting State IV-D agencies settheir own timeframes. A number of commenters asked that States not be subject to a determinationof substantial compliance with the program standards as a result of anaudit until there has been a period of evaluation of State performancewith respect to the proposed standards. One commenter requested 100 percentFederal funding of the cost of implementation for a period of time priorto the effective date of the requirements and evaluation of the resultsachieved before such date. Some State agencies asked for technical assistancein meeting the timeframes established. <T3>Response: </T3>The Congress, in requiring the Secretary to publish,within 10 months of the effective date of the Family Support Act of 1988,final regulations requiring States to provide IV-D services, includingprompt distribution of collections to families, did not intend that theeffective date of those regulations be inordinately delayed. Several commentersnoted that many of the requirements set forth in the proposed rule reflectedgood management and were achievable in a well-run child support operationtoday. Therefore, while we are sympathetic to the demands placed upon States bythe new requirements, we believe that the approach most consistent withCongressional intent with respect to implementation of the timeframes andwith the pressing need for performance improvement is to retain the October1, 1990, effective date. We have, however, extended or revised many ofthe proposed timeframes to take into consideration the concerns of commentersand believe the revised timeframes to be indicative of alternative timeframessuggested by many States. We intend to consider concerns about how to assesscompliance in developing audit requirements for these standards (see responseto next comment). 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters requested that we change the current auditstandard of 75 percent compliance with program requirements to begin witha lower percentage and increase the percentage of cases which must be processedin accordance with the timeframes between 1991 and 1995. One example givenwas 50 percent compliance in FY 1991, increasing by 5 percent a year until75 percent compliance would be required in FY 1996. Alternatively, 40 percentcompliance initially was suggested with an increase of 10 percent a yearuntil a 75 percent compliance rate was reached in a later year. Other commenters,by the same token, requested a more stringent compliance standard (forservices other than paternity establishment), suggesting between 90 and98 percent rather than 75 percent, depending on the services needed inthe case. <T3>Response: </T3>Given the impact of these regulations, we are convincedby the commenters that the best way to ensure that States work all casesand provide all necessary services in accordance with the new program standardsand timeframes would be to assess State compliance over a period of time.We are in the process of revising the audit regulations to address thenew program standards and intend to publish a proposed audit regulationas soon as possible after publication of this regulation. Final revisedaudit regulations are scheduled to be published before the October 1, 1990,effective date for program standards. Specific suggestions for assessingState compliance with the new requirements will be considered in revisingthe audit regulation. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>We solicited comments on what steps we should take toreflect improvements in case processing over time. Options presented inthe preamble to the proposed rule were: (1) Wait to decide whether andhow to change timeframes; (2) write into the final regulation a date bywhich the regulations must be reviewed and updated; and (3) write intothe regulations shorter timeframes for years after 1990. We received preferencesfor each of the three options by those who responded. The majority of thosewho commented indicated that we should wait until after the standards areeffective and State compliance has been evaluated before making any decisionswith respect to revisions. States and localities wondered how we couldplan to change standards before we have any experience with their impact.Some commenters preferred the regulations to include a date by which standardswill be reviewed and revised. Suggestions for the timing of reviews rangedfrom 18 months to 4 years. It was suggested that revised standards be submittedto the Congress and that IV-D agencies and the courts have an opportunityto comment on the proposed standards.<T3>Response:</T3> As a result of these comments, we have decided to waituntil there is some base of experience with full implementation of thetimeframes before we determine how or whether to revise them. However,we plan to look at operational experience with the timeframes and instituteany necessary changes or other action within no more than 4 years of theeffective date of October 1, 1990. 4.<T3> Comment:</T3> Several States stressed the need for clear and preciseprogram standards which are not subject to interpretation by the auditors.They indicated that regulations are sometimes interpreted differently byauditors and any discretion on their part should be removed. They requestedthat changes to the audit regulations and audit guides to evaluate Statecompliance with the time standards be issued at the same time as the finalregulations. A number of commenters were concerned about the need for,and how to, document compliance with each of the standards. They requestedthat documentation to prove compliance with case processing requirementsbe explicitly stated in regulations. States were concerned that documentationof each timeframe would be time consuming and take time which could otherwisebe spent working cases. Commenters were concerned about documentation asthe only way to prove action had been taken on a case. <T3>Response:</T3> We have revised the proposed regulations to attemptto remove any ambiguity which might be subject to varying interpretation.In addition, as discussed previously, we are currently revising audit regulationsto address the requirements of this regulation. Those regulations willbe published for comment as soon as possible after publication of theseregulations in final form. With respect to concerns about documentation,States have always been, and will continue to be, responsible for proof,for purposes of an audit, that they are meeting program requirements orhave met them with respect to a particular case. Necessary documentationis not specified in regulations because to do so would be overly prescriptiveand it would be impossible to specify every type of documentation whichwould indicate compliance with each regulatory requirement. Eliminationof an auditor's professional judgment is neither possible nor desirable,but a variety of internal quality controls ensures national consistencyin the conduct of the audit function. Finally, we believe that the revisionsto the proposed rule to eliminate unnecessary interim timeframes are responsiveto States' concerns that documentation will be too time-consuming.Overall Alternative Approaches1. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received a number of alternatives to our approachto ensuring prompt response to requests for IV-D services. One State suggestedthat we recommend, rather than require, specific timeframes for case processing,and establish audit requirements based on end results, such as those inplace for expedited processes for establishing and enforcing support orders.Specifically, the State recommended that actions taken to open cases, initiateabsent parent or putative father locations, and where location of the parentis known, file petitions for paternity and/or support be required to becompleted in 60 percent of the cases within three months, 70 percent withinsix months, and 75 percent within one year. Another alternative was toestablish standards similar to the paternity establishment standard establishedby the Family Support Act, under which a State's performance is evaluatedbased on the percentage of actions taken out of the total actions neededto be taken, with a specific improvement in performance required each year.Finally, a commenter suggested that we mandate timeframes for major functionsof the IV-D program, not each step of the process.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe that changes made to the proposed rule toeliminate certain specific timeframes are consistent with the broader approachrequested by some States. We disagree with the suggestion that we implementexpedited processes-type timeframes for processing cases. We received anumber of comments requesting that individual timeframes be imposed tocontrol specific actions taken by different entities administering oneor more facets of a State's overall IV-D program. Given the extent of commentsabout how many different entities are involved in the IV-D process, lackof adequate case management processes in many IV-D programs and delaysin providing services, we believe that setting specific timeframes foreach step of the process will ensure States provide necessary serviceson a timely basis. Finally, a standard based on the percentage of actionstaken out of the total actions needed to be taken is not a measure of promptresponse to requests for services.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters suggested that we convert proposedtimeframes so that all timeframes of over 9 days are calendar day timeframesand all timeframes of 9 or fewer days are work days.<T3>Response:</T3> While we believe that looking back at case records anddetermining work days for audit purposes will necessitate additional effort,a State could be seriously disadvantaged in trying to meet calendar daytimeframes of less than 10 days because of intervening weekends. Therefore,we have changed proposed timeframes by clarifying that those between 1and 10 days are working days and timeframes of 11 days and above are calendardays. Furthermore, we have converted proposed timeframes of between 11and 30 workdays to an approximate equivalent number of calendar days, forexample, 15 workdays becomes 20 calendar days and 30 workdays becomes 40calendar days.3. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received many comments on each of the timeframes requiringIV-D agencies to, within 2 working days of completing one action, initiatethe next necessary action or service. For example, when there is adequatelocation information to proceed with the case, the State must initiatean appropriate service within 2 working days of determination of the nextappropriate action or service. Commenters were concerned that the requirementwas too vague; they wanted us to define ``initiate,'' ``appropriate,''and ``determination.'' They were also concerned that 2 working days isnot adequate to prepare all the documents necessary to take an action,for example, request service of process or prepare a petition for paternityestablishment. They requested the timeframe be extended to anywhere from5 to 45 working days. Commenters were unsure about whether the requirementwas to start to take an action or to finish it. They indicated that the2-day timeframes are unrealistic and don't account for illness, vacation,training or loss of staff. A number of commenters suggested that we eliminatethese interim timeframes and include the actions required under an overalltimeframe.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to these comments we have removed the proposedrequirements to initiate the next appropriate action or service under proposedandSection;andSection; 303.2(c)(3) and 303.3(b)(6). Our intent is that casesmove forward to the next step in case processing just as soon as an actionis completed. However, we believe that since each timeframe begins withthe accomplishment of the previous task, i.e., the timeframe for supportorder establishment begins with location of the absent parent or paternityestablishment, there is no need for these work-initiation timeframes. Commentersconvinced us that they are too burdensome to document, too vague to ensureconsistent application or interpretation with respect to compliance, andtruly unnecessary given the encompassing structure of other timeframes.4. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters indicated that, if these timeframesare effective before 1995 when States must have operational automated systems,modifications to current automated systems will be necessary and Federalfunding should be available for those modifications.<T3>Response:</T3> Federal funding under the IV-D program is availablefor modifications to automated systems necessary to ensure compliance withthese requirements.Suggestions Beyond the Scope of These Regulations 1. <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters requested that the incentive funding structurebe changed to remove the cap on incentives paid on non-AFDC collectionsbecause it acts as a disincentive to providing services in non-AFDC cases.Commenters also were concerned that Congress not adopt a minimum cost tocollections ratio for States to qualify for incentive payments. They arguethat necessary changes to comply with new requirements will be costly andStates should not be penalized by the fact that cost to collection ratiosslip. <T3>Response:</T3> The incentive funding structure is specified in thestatute and changes to it are, therefore, beyond the scope of this regulation.States which implement effective case management procedures and aggressivelyuse available enforcement techniques can and do operate a cost effectiveIV-D program. 2. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of States also requested that the $50 disregardand pass-through provisions of the statute be repealed and alternativelyAFDC grants be increased across the board. Commenters argued that the $50pass-through provision is cumbersome to administer, discriminates againstchildren whose absent parents cannot be made to pay support, and doesn'tresult in greater cooperation from the custodial parent or compliance bythe absent parent, as intended by the Congress. <T3>Response:</T3> As the commenters recognized, any change in the $50disregard and pass-through provisions would require a change in the statutegoverning the IV-A and IV-D programs. 3. <T3>Comment:</T3> Some commenters requested specific changes to the regulationsgoverning the IV-A program. Specifically, they asked that IV-A agenciesbe required to determine AFDC eligibility within 2 rather than 47 daysand to notify the IV-D agency within 2 days of application for AFDC, asopposed to the current requirement of notice within 2 days of determinationof eligibility. Similarly, commenters requested a 2-day timeframe for noticeby the IV-A agency to the IV-D agency of AFDC ineligibility or termination.Another commenter requested that standards be established for referraland processing of cases within the IV-A system and that applicants forAFDC be required to provide minimal information elements as a prerequisiteto AFDC eligibility. <T3>Response:</T3> The requested changes to AFDC program regulations arebeyond the scope of these regulations, which is to establish standardsfor prompt response to requests for services under the IV-D program, includingprompt distribution of collections to families. However, the Family SupportAdministration is committed to considering ways to strengthen those IV-Aprogram requirements governing AFDC applicant and recipient cooperationso as to improve the quality and timeliness of information transfer betweenthe IV-A and IV-D programs. Support Payment to the IV-D Agency_Section 302.32 <ITAG tagnum="81">Title of Section </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter suggested that since andSection; 302.32 nowcontains requirements for distribution of collections, the title of thesection should be changed to reflect this additional content. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree and have changed the title to ``Collectionand Distribution of Support Payments by the IV-D Agency.'' <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(b)_Informing the IV-A Agency of Collections </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received a number of comments on the proposed requirementthat IV-D agencies report the amount of any support collection to the IV-Aagency within 10 working days of the collection. Commenters indicated thatdaily notice serves no practical purpose and would unnecessarily complicatethe recordkeeping process because nothing can be done to redetermine AFDCeligibility until all collections for a month have been received. Alternativessuggested included keeping the current requirement that IV-D agencies reportthe amount of the collection ``as soon as possible but not later than 30days after the end of a month,'' or requiring notice to the IV-A agencywithin 10 days of the end of the month or 10 calendar days from the dateof initial receipt in the State. The alternative suggested by the mostcommenters was 10 working days from the end of the month of collection.<T3>Response:</T3> In retrospect and in light of the comments received,we agree that requiring notice to the IV-A agency within 10 calendar daysof initial receipt in the State would be unduly stringent. We have revisedandSection; 302.32(b) as suggested by many commenters, to require the IV-Dagency to inform the IV-A agency of the amount of the collection whichrepresents payment on the required support obligation for the month within10 working days of the end of the month in which the support is receivedby the IV-D agency responsible for final distribution of the collection.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked if notice to the IV-A agency includednotice of collection of past-due support or just notice of current supportcollected. <T3>Response:</T3> Under andSection; 302.32(b), the 10-working day reportingrequirement applies only to the amount of collection which represents paymenton the required support obligation for the month.3. <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters asked whether direct, on-lineaccess by IV-A agencies to IV-D collection data meets the requirementsfor notice to the IV-A agency required under andSection;302.32(b). <T3>Response:</T3> Direct, on-line access to IV-D collection data meetsthe requirement for notice under andSection; 302.32(b). 4. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter asked why the proposal for reporting collectionsto the IV-A agency was inconsistent with the requirement for AFDC recipientsto report collections within the first and fifth of each month. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe the commenter is referring to the requirementat 45 CFR 233.36 for AFDC recipients to report earned income monthly tothe IV-A agency. There is no Federal requirement to report income within1 to 5 days of the end of the month. Because the timeframe for the IV-Dagency to report collections to the IV-A agency is now linked to a fullcalendar month, it is consistent with the requirement for AFDC recipientsto report earned income. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(f)_Timeframes for Distribution of Collections </ITAG>GeneralComments 1. <T3>Comment: </T3>A few commenters questioned use of the term ``distribution,''and whether it was being confused with disbursement. They defined distributionas a process to identify the elements of a payment and to allocate thepayment among those elements, i.e., $50 pass-through, current AFDC reimbursement,current support payment to family, past AFDC reimbursement, arrearagespayment to family. They view disbursement as the sending of the paymentitself and suggested that we either establish timeframes for disbursementof payments to families or establish one timeframe for the entire distributionprocess. <T3>Response:</T3> While we agree with the commenter's characterizationof disbursement versus distribution, because Congress referred, in theFamily Support Act, to ``distribution'' of collections to families, ``distribution''is generally used in these regulations. We have, however, in response tocomments addressed later, revised the proposed requirements to establishtimeframes for sending (disbursing) collections to families. We are notestablishing one timeframe for the entire distribution process in AFDCcases because, while distribution to families of amounts in excess of the$50 pass-through payment depends on whether or not the family continuesto be eligible for AFDC, the $50 pass-through payment itself does not,and may be sent to the family without waiting for eligibility redetermination.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received a number of comments on the start date oftimeframes for distribution of collections. One commenter wanted us toclarify ``initial receipt in the State.'' <T3>Response:</T3> We clarified the meaning of initial receipt in the Statein response to comments on the final regulation on the $50 pass-throughin AFDC cases published June 9, 1988 (53 FR 21643). ``Initial receipt inthe State'' for distribution purposes means when a collection is receivedby the first entity or agency of the State, whether or not the agency orentity is under cooperative or other agreement with the IV-D agency. Thisincludes a clerk of the court, an employment security agency in cases ofunemployment compensation withholding, or a bank handling collection responsibilitiesunder contract with a government agency. 3. <T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter wanted the distribution timeframes to startwith the date a payment is identified because, when payments are receivedwithout identifying information, it takes time to determine for whom thepayment is intended. <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that unidentified payments can be identifiedwithin the required timeframes for distribution. For example, we receivedcomments from a State which indicated that even if a payment lacked identifyinginformation, the State could determine to whom it was owed within the timeframe.In any event, if a payment is made without information which links it toa specific IV-D case and the State documents that it is unable to determineto whom the payment is owed, the State would not be penalized for failingto meet the timeframe for distribution in that case. 4. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of States, especially those which do not havecooperative agreements with the courts which receive and/or distributecollections, requested that we start the timeframe for distribution ofcollections from the date of receipt in the IV-D  agency. They argue thatthey have no control over the courts and cannot make them meet the timeframes.Some States which have State-supervised, county-administered IV-D programsindicated that they could not meet the 15 working day timeframes for distributionbecause of the structure of their programs. Some of those States, as wellas States in which the courts collect support, urged us to retain the requirementthat collections must be forwarded within 10 days of receipt by any agencynot responsible for final distribution of the collection. They argued thatthe 10-day requirement is the only leverage they have to ensure collectionsare forwarded timely. Another commenter urged that we require any entityother than the agency responsible for final distribution to transmit thecollection within 5 working days of receipt. Still another suggested 3working days was sufficient. <T3>Response:</T3> Congress expressed its concern about the delays in forwardingcollections to families who are in need of them by requiring the Secretaryto publish timeframes for prompt distribution of those collections. Theyindicated the urgency of establishing timeframes by requiring publicationof final regulations within 10 months of enactment of the Family SupportAct. State IV-D agencies are responsible for sending collections to familiesin IV-D cases, regardless of whether or not they have cooperative agreementswith the courts that collect support obligations. State-supervised, county-administeredIV-D programs are no less responsible for timely distribution of collectionsto families than State-run IV-D programs. Families should not suffer delaysin receiving the support they need because of the structure of IV-D programs.Federal funding of States' IV-A and IV-D programs depends on compliancewith Federal IV-D requirements, regardless of whether or not there arecooperative agreements between courts and IV-D agencies or whether theprogram is State-supervised and county administered. The designated singleState IV-D agency is responsible for ensuring that all program requirementsare carried out within the State; to this end, it can certainly apportionappropriate segments of the overall timeframe for distribution among theentities involved in program administration. In keeping with our response to comments requesting that we not imposeexcessively detailed timeframes for each step of the process and becauseStates need flexibility commensurate with their responsibility for ensuringcompliance with title IV-D requirements, we have not added the 10-day timeframewithin which each entity other than the agency responsible for final distributionmust forward the collection. 5. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked that we require States to establisha grievance process to resolve disputes with respect to timely and accuratedistribution of collections. Several commenters requested that the processbe extended to resolve disputes over adequate provision of all servicesto ensure that the program standards requirements are followed by States.They suggested that States be required to establish toll-free numbers forcustodial parents to call for information or to discuss how collectionswere distributed. In addition, they requested that States be required topay custodial parents any interest earned on collections.<T3>Response: </T3>There is nothing to preclude a State from setting upsuch a system to resolve disputes. However, there is no evidence that sucha system is warranted in all States. Furthermore, State compliance withprogram requirements, such as these performance standards, is measuredby program audits and other less formal reviews conducted by Federal staff.We believe that most States are distributing collections accurately andthat grievance procedures are unnecessary. Finally, States are permittedto pay interest earned on non-AFDC collections paid to families to thosefamilies. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(f)(1)_Interstate Collections </ITAG><T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters requested that the timeframe for forwardinginterstate collections, like other distribution timeframes, be reducedfrom 10 working to 10 calendar days. Alternatively, several State and localagency commenters requested that the timeframe for forwarding collectionsin interstate cases be changed to 15 working days to avoid any distinctionbetween distribution timeframes for interstate and intrastate cases. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that there should be consistent interstateand intrastate distribution timeframes and have changed the proposed 10working day timeframe for the responding State IV-D agency to forward collectionsto 15 calendar days from the date of initial receipt in the respondingState. This is consistent with the requirement in andSection; 302.32(f)(3)(i)to send collections to non-AFDC families within 15 calendar days of thedate of initial receipt in the State. However, reducing the timeframe to10 calendar days would be unduly restrictive at this time. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 302.32(f)(2)_AFDC Collections </ITAG>a. $50 Pass Through Paymentsto Families 1. <T3>Comment: </T3>Almost every comment we received from a State or localIV-D agency objected to the proposal that payments to the AFDC family underandSection; 302.51(b)(1) be made within 15 working days of the date of initialreceipt in the State. Commenters strongly urged that IV-D agencies notbe required to pay multiple pass-through payments until $50 is collectedin cases in which payments are made weekly. Commenters suggested the timeframefor sending the $50 pass-through to families be tied to the end of themonth of collection or the date at least $50 is collected. In addition,commenters indicated that, if finalized, the proposal would require dailydistribution of collections which has proven in at least one State to beconfusing to AFDC recipients and difficult to administer. <T3>Response: </T3>It was never our intention that States make multipleincremental payments of less than $50 to the AFDC family until the $50limit on the pass-through of child support is reached. Recognizing thatsupport may be paid weekly or bi-weekly, we have revised andSection; 302.32(f)(2)(i)to make clear that one payment per month of up to $50 be passed throughto AFDC families under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) within 15 calendar days ofthe date of initial receipt in the State of the first $50 of support collectedin a month, or, if less than $50 is collected in a month, within 15 calendardays of the end of the month in which the support is collected. The onlyinstance where multiple pass-through payments are required would be whentimely payments were made but not received by the agency responsible forfinal distribution until a later month in accordance with andSection; 302.51of this part. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Almost every commenter suggested alternative timeframesfor passing through the first $50 of support collected in a month. Suggestionsincluded 5, 7, 10, 15, 21 working days, or 15, 17, 21, 60 calendar daysafter the end of the month of collection. Others suggested keeping thecurrent requirement at andSection; 302.51(b) (3) and (5) for distributionby the end of the month following the month in which the amount of thecollection is used to redetermine AFDC eligibility. Another alternativewas to pay the $50 pass-through to the family within 15 working days afterthe total monthly obligation is collected or a minimum of $50 is collected,or when the next AFDC benefit check is mailed. A State IV-D agency arguedthat tying payment to the family to the next benefit check was unacceptablebecause the next month's check is produced at the end of the previous month(the month of collection) to allow mailing on the last working day of theprevious month. Many State and local agencies based their argument for longer timeframeson the need for enhanced automation or the need to assure that checks clearedbefore paying the family. One commenter argued that the date of receiptshould be changed to the date the check clear because out-of-State checkstake 25 days to clears and in-State checks take 3 working days, or 15 workingdays if resubmitted, to clear. In response to anticipated State comments that checks have to clear beforepayments may go to the family, other commenters referenced Federal bankingrequirements which require in-State checks to be cleared within 4 workingdays and out-of-State checks to be cleared in 7 working days. These commentersargued that States, not custodial parents, should run the risk of checksnot clearing because that is the purpose of the IV-D program. Commenters requesting stricter timeframes suggested the proposed timeframewas much too long and 2 working days should be sufficient for any automatedsystem. Other commenters argued that 15 calendar days from the end of themonth of collection was adequate in automated States but 30 to 45 workingdays was more reasonable in States which are not fully automated. Stillother commenters argued that, while 15 days for the first or last paymentto be made to the family is understandable given the need to redirect paymentsin new or recently terminated AFDC cases, 2 to 3 working days should beadequate to pay collections to the family in regularly paying cases. Finally, a number of commenters urged that the timeframe for payment ofthe $50 pass-through to AFDC families be required in regulations governingIV-A agencies because the IV-A agency frequently is responsible for makingthe $50 pass-through payment for the IV-D agency. <T3>Response: </T3>Given the many comments we received on this provisionof the proposed regulations, we have carefully reconsidered our proposedrequirement. We agree with advocates who argue that Federal banking requirementsprohibit financial institutions from holding checks for extended periodsto ensure clearance. In response to comments, we are revising regulationsgoverning the IV-A program at andSection; 232.20(d) to require the IV-A agencyto pay to the family the sum disregarded under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) within20 calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State of the first$50 of support collected in a month, or, if less than $50 is collectedin a month, within 20 calendar days of the end of the month in which thesupport is collected. Some State IV-A agencies enter into agreements underwhich the IV-D agency sends the $50 payment to AFDC families. In thoseStates, the IV-D agency must send the pass-through payment to the familywithin the 15-calendar day requirement in andSection; 302.32(f)(2)(i) becausethere is no need to transfer the collection from the IV-D to the IV-A agency.In the majority of States in which the IV-A agency sends the pass-throughpayment to the family, andSection; 302.32(f)(2)(i) requires that the IV-Dagency forward the collection to the IV-A agency within 15 calendar daysof the date of initial receipt in the State of the first $50 of supportcollected in a month, or, if less than $50 is collected in a month, within15 calendar days of the end of the month in which the support was collected.We believe that these timeframes are adequate for any State, whether fullyautomated or not, to distribute the $50 pass-through payment to AFDC families.b. <T3>AFDC collections in excess of the first $50</T3>_1. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received comments on our proposal to require the IV-Dagency to distribute collections in excess of the $50 pass-through paymentunder andSection; 302.52(b)(1) to the IV-A agency with 15 working days ofnotice of AFDC eligibility redetermination. Commenters argued that therewas no need to regulate prompt distribution of amounts to be retained bythe State and Federal governments, either in AFDC or title IV-E fostercare cases as proposed in andSection; 302.32(f)(2) (ii) and (iii), becauseit would be administratively complex and costly and would serve no practicalbenefit to do so. They argued that the Congress, in Pub. L. 100-485, onlyinstructed the Secretary to regulate prompt distribution of collectionsdue to families, not to be retained by States.<T3>Response:</T3> Section 122 of Pub. L. 100-485 requires the Secretaryto establish time limits for distributing child support collections, andthe Conference Report (H. Rep. 100-998) on page 99 requires time limitswithin which child support payments must be distributed ``to the familiesto whom they are owed.'' Because we agree that the intent of Congress wasexpeditious distribution of collections owed to families, rather than thosecollections assigned to, and retained by, the State in AFDC cases, we haverevised andSection; 302.32(f)(2)(ii) to require distribution only of collectionsin excess of the $50 pass-through which are paid to families in AFDC cases.We have made similar revisions with respect to collections in title IV-Efoster care cases to ensure timely payment to the agency responsible forthe child's needs of any collections to be used to serve the child's bestinterests.2.<T3> Comment:</T3> A number of commenters expressed concern about delaysof up to five months in forwarding payments to families after AFDC eligibilityterminates. They stressed that such delays are untenable because the formerAFDC family must rely on the support collection as a substitute, or partialsubstitute, for the amount the family previously received under the AFDCprogram. Alternatives to the proposed 15-working day timeframe ranged from10 calendar days of notice of eligibility redetermination to 20 days fromthe end of the month of collection. Other commenters requested that thesupport collection be paid to the family no later than the date the familywould have received the next AFDC check. Other commenters pointed out thatIV-A agencies are not required to notify IV-D agencies of a family's continuedAFDC eligibility; they are only required to notify the IV-D agency of theeffective date of the family's ineligibility.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to comments, and because we are imposingtimeframes only for distribution of amounts paid to families, we have revisedandSection; 302.32(f)(2)(ii) to require that, with the exception of Federaland State income tax refund offset collections which are dealt with separately,collections for the month following the month in which the family receivesits last assistance payment and any collections paid to the family underandSection; 302.51(b) (3) and (5) must be sent to the family within 15 calendardays of initial receipt in the State of a collection for the first monthof ineligibility. We are not requiring States to send payments to the familyby the date that the family would have received their next AFDC benefitcheck had benefits not been terminated, because that date may occur toosoon to allow the IV-D agency adequate time to meet the timeframe. However,we strongly urge States to attempt to forward collections to the familyas close to that date as possible.c.<T3> Non-AFDC collections</T3>_1.<T3> Comment:</T3> We received many comments on the timeframe for distributionof collections in non-AFDC cases. Suggested alternatives ranged from 5calendar days to 35 days from initial receipt in the State. Commentersalso suggested a separate timeframe of 2 working days for non-AFDC casesin which no AFDC arrearages are owed, as well as 10 days initially, tobe shortened when States are automated and upon reassessment of the timeframein 2 years. A number of commenters indicated that 15 working days was sufficientif mailing the payment to the last known address of the custodial parentmeets the requirement. Some commenters wanted a longer timeframe to accountfor unusual circumstances which may preclude timely distribution whileothers urged that we not establish a standard based on time necessary todistribute support in difficult cases.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to concerns for prompt payment of collectionsto families in non-AFDC cases, we revised the proposed 15-working day timeframeto require IV-D agencies to send current support payments to non-AFDC familieswithin 15 calendar days from the date of initial receipt in the State.We do not believe a standard should be set based on the time it takes todistribute collections in difficult cases which are the exception and notthe rule. Mailing the payment to the last known address of the custodialparent would meet the requirement. If such payments are returned, however,States should attempt to promptly determine a new address for the custodialparent. We did not establish separate 2-day timeframes for distributionin non-AFDC cases in which there are no AFDC arrearages because we do notwant to make distribution, complicated by its very nature, unduly so byrequiring a myriad of different timeframes for each type of case.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> We also received a number of comments on proposed andSection;302.32(f)(3)(ii) which would allow States to determine whether to pay arrearagecollections to the family first or reimburse itself for unreimbursed pastassistance paid to the family. Commenters were divided between wantingus to require payment to the family first or to require that State's retainamounts to reimburse unreimbursed past assistance first. Those in favorof paying the family first argued the family should receive arrearage paymentsto help them remain self-sufficient. One commenter urged that at leastthose arrearages which accrue after the family leaves the AFDC rolls shouldbe paid to the family before the State retains its share of what it isowed. Those in favor of reimbursing the government for unreimbursed assistancepaid to the family first argued that paying the family first violates section457(b)(4) of the Act and andSection; 302.51(f). <T3>Response:</T3> Section 457(b) sets forth the distribution scheme forAFDC cases; section 457(c) governs services to former AFDC recipients andrequires State IV-D agencies to continue to provide IV-D services to formerAFDC cases subject to the same conditions and on the same basis as in thecase of non-AFDC cases receiving services under 454(6) of the Act. Sincesection 454(6) is silent regarding the distribution of amounts collectedin non AFDC cases, our longstanding policy has been to allow States flexibilityregarding distribution of amounts collected in excess of current supportin non-AFDC cases when there are both arrearages owed to the State andarrearages owed to the family. While andSection; 302.51(f) requires Statesto attempt to collect any unpaid support after the family leaves the AFDCroles to reimburse the State and Federal government for unreimbursed assistancepaid to the family, we agree that paying arrearages to a non-AFDC familybefore reimbursing unreimbursed assistance may impact positively on thefamily's ability to remain self-sufficient. We are in the process of clarifyingdistribution requirements in a separate rulemaking effort and will addressthis issue in more detail in that document. Since this final rule is establishingtimeframes for distribution rather than distribution requirements themselves,we retained State flexibility in the final rule under paragraph (f)(3)(ii)but changed the proposed requirement to require IV-D agencies which sendamounts to the non-AFDC family to satisfy past-due support to do so withinthe 15 calendar days, for consistency with paragraph (f)(3)(i). d. <T3>Federal and State income tax refund offset collections_</T3>1. <T3>Comment:</T3> Most States requested a longer period of time withinwhich to distribute collections made through offset of Federal and Stateincome tax refunds. Suggested alternatives ranged from distribution within15 days of receipt by the agency responsible for final distribution todistribution within 180 days of receipt. Most commenters, however, suggestedcollections be distributed within approximately 30 to 45 calendar daysof receipt or within 15 days of expiration of any post-offset appeal orreview process required by State law. States requested that the timeframecommence with receipt by the IV-D agency to avoid including receipt bythe State Revenue Agency which is responsible for the State income taxrefund offset process.<T3>Response:</T3> We are convinced by commenters that additional timeis needed to distribute these collections because of their volume. Therefore,we require in andSection; 302.32(f)(2)(iv) that IV-D agencies send to theAFDC family or IV-E agency, as appropriate, within 30 calendar days ofreceipt by the IV-D agency amounts offset in AFDC cases and paid to thefamily under andSection; 302.51(b)(5) and amounts offset in title IV-E fostercare cases and distributed under andSection; 302.52(b)(4), unless State lawrequires a post-offset appeal process and an appeal is filed, in whichcase the IV-D agency must send any payment to the AFDC family or IV-E agencywithin 15 calendar days of the date the appeal is resolved. We also revisedandSection; 302.32(f)(3)(iii) to require the IV-D agency to send amountsoffset in non-AFDC cases to the family within 30 calendar days of receiptby the IV-D agency, with two exceptions. First, if State law requires apost-offset appeal process and an appeal is filed, the IV-D agency mustsend the payment to the family within 15 calendar days of the date theappeal is resolved. Second, in accordance With andSection; 303.72(h)(5),if the Secretary of the Treasury, through OCSE, notifies the State thatan offset is being made to satisfy non-AFDC past-due support from a refundbased on a joint return, the State may delay distribution until notifiedthat the unobligated spouse's proper share of the refund has been paidor for a period not to exceed six months from notification of offset, whicheveris earlier. We want to stress, however, that States may not routinely holdtax offset collections in non-AFDC cases for up to 6 months. The IV-D agencymust receive a notice that a joint refund is involved before distributionmay be delayed in such cases. 4. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters asked that we clarify that andSection;302.32(f)(3)(iii) requires State, as well as Federal, income tax refundoffset collections to be distributed in non-AFDC cases within the specifiedtimeframe. <T3>Response:</T3> We inadvertently omitted reference in andSection; 302.32(f)(3)(iii)to State tax refund offset distribution in non-AFDC cases. Distributionof such amounts is required within the same timeframe as distribution forFederal income tax refund offset collections in non-AFDC cases. 3. <T3>Comment:</T3> A commenter indicated that offset collections can bedistributed only after both the collections and the tape specifying fromwhom the collections were made are received. <T3>Response:</T3> The 30-calendar day timeframe should allow adequatetime to receive both the collections and the magnetic tape and to distributethe collections.Establishment of Cases/Maintenance of Case Records_Section 303.2  <ITAG tagnum="81">Application Process_Section 303.2(a) </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment:</T3> Commenters requested that IV-A agencies be required torefer AFDC cases immediately or within two working days to the IV-D agencybecause families applying for AFDC are in immediate need of child supportpayments. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 235.70 requires referral of AFDC cases to theIV-D agency within 2 days of eligibility determination and allows referralearlier at State discretion. Some States refer cases immediately upon applicationfor AFDC or have co-located IV-A and IV-D offices so that IV-D servicesare provided prior to AFDC eligibility being determined and within thetimeframe allowed for the eligibility determination process. Because somefamilies are subsequently determined to be ineligible for AFDC and maynot want to apply for IV-D services, we do not believe immediate referralshould be mandatory at this time. An earlier response noted the Family Support Administration's commitmentto strengthen interaction between the IV-A and IV-D programs. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received many comments on the requirement to provideapplications on the day an individual requests an application for services.Commenters asked that we allow a State between 2 and 10 working days torespond to a request for an application to allow for unpredictable personnelevents and requests received late in the day. We were asked to requirethat applications be given to individuals who come into the IV-D agencyto request services on the day they come in and that applications be mailedto individuals within 2 to 5 working days of a telephone or written request.Some commenters requested that States be required, if applications arefiled in the wrong office, to refer them to the correct office immediatelyand to inform custodial parents that written applications are necessary.<T3>Response: </T3>We revised the requirement in andSection; 303.2(a)(2)to require IV-D agencies to provide an application to an individual whorequests an application or services in person on the date of the requestand to send applications to individuals within no more than 5 working daysof a written or telephone request. We did not require IV-D agencies toforward applications to the correct IV-D office because an applicationmay be filed at any IV-D office. Although written applications are necessary, we did not add a requirementthat States inform custodial parents of that fact because we believe itis obvious. States may include such a statement in information publicizingthe availability of services under the IV-D program. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters requested that States be required to explainthe rights and responsibilities and distribution policies of the IV-D programto AFDC as well as non-AFDC families because AFDC recipients have a rightto, and need to know, this information. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree that States should explain the IV-D programand its procedures, as well as the rights and responsibilities of thosewho receive IV-D services, to any individual receiving IV-D services. Therefore,we have revised andSection; 303.2(a)(2) to require the IV-D agency to providethat information to AFDC, Medicaid, and title IV-E foster care applicantsor recipients within no more than 5 working days of referral to the IV-Dagency. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters requested that IV-D agencies berequired to accept an application as filed on the day it is filed and theapplication fee is paid. <T3>Response: </T3>We have revised andSection; 303.2(a)(3) to require theIV-D agency to accept as filed an application signed by the individualapplying for IV-D services on the day it and the application fee are received.An application should be accepted as filed if it is completed to the bestof the individual's ability, signed, and submitted to the IV-D agency.5. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters asked that we not require IV-D agencies toaccept applications until relevant information is provided which is necessaryto determine whether IV-D services are available to the individual. Theyargued that States must be able to require certain minimal data to determineif a case should be opened, e.g., the name and address of the custodialparent, age of the children, and residence of the custodial parent. Statesargued that services are only available if there is a minor child or thecustodial parent is a resident of the State. With respect to providingservices to non-minor children, a commenter urged that States only be requiredto provide services in cases in which application is received when thechild is a minor. Finally, commenters requested that the IV-D agency notbe required to accept applications until an intake interview is conducted.<T3>Response: </T3>Accepting applications should not involve any actionby the IV-D agency other than recording the date of filing on the application.There are no conditions for receipt of IV-D services other than the requirementto file a written application requesting child support enforcement servicesunder the IV-D program. Anyone may apply for IV-D services who needs helpwith securing child support; availability of services is not limited tominors or to those who are residents of the State. While States argue thatthey should not be required to provide IV-D services in cases in whichthe child is no longer a minor, to limit availability of services to minorchildren would encourage absent parents to avoid their support obligationsuntil the child reaches the age of majority. States may not work casesin anticipation of being able to close those cases once the child reachesthe age of majority. 6. <T3>Comment: </T3>A commenter requested that we define more specificallywhat an application for IV-D services is and asked if an endorsed check,a petition for establishment of paternity or support establishment or enforcement,or application by operation of State law meet the regulatory requirements.<T3>Response: </T3>In order to comply with Federal requirements of filingan application, the application must be in writing, be signed by the individua1,and clearly state that the individual is applying for child support enforcementservices under the State's IV-D program. We revised the definition in paragraph(a)(3) slightly to specifically refer to child support enforcement servicesunder the State's IV-D program. A petition with the court or administrativeauthority responsible for establishing paternity and/or establishing andenforcing support obligations may be considered an application if the petitionis signed by the individual requesting services and clearly states thatthe individual is requesting child support enforcement services under theState's title IV-D program. An endorsement on the back of a support checkdoes not meet requirements for an application for services. Applicationdeemed by operation of State law does not meet the requirement for applicationfor IV-D services because it does not allow the individual the option tochoose whether or not to apply for IV-D services provided under section454(6) of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">Case Opening and Actions Required Within 20 Calendar Days of Receiptof Referral or Application_Section 303.2 (b) and (c) </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters asked if the 2-day timeframe forcase opening is intended to include action by the central registry in interstatecases. Otherwise, commenters generally asked that the 2-day timeframe beexpanded to between 5 and 10 working days or, alternatively, be eliminatedand the required actions be included under the 15-working day timeframein proposed andSection; 303.2(c). Other commenters wanted clarification thata case is considered ``opened'' if a record of the application or referralhas been created and an identification number has been assigned. Anothercommenter indicated that she could not meet the 2-day timeframe for openinga case because of her ethical duty under State law to determine whetheran applicant has a legally defensible case and a case that she can legallypursue. <T3>Response: </T3>The case opening requirement in andSection; 303.2 appliesto the initial opening of a IV-D case upon referral or application forservices; it does not include taking action upon receipt of an interstatereferral. The requirements in andSection; 303.7 for central registries applyto interstate cases.  We did not intend that any substantive action or decision must be madeon a case within the 2-day timeframe for case opening. However, we areconvinced by States' arguments that we should not impose timeframes foreach specific action required but establish timeframes governing broadernecessary actions. Therefore, we have deleted the separate 2-day timeframefor opening a case and revised andSection; 303.2(b) to require the IV-D agencyto open a case by establishing a case record within the 15-working daytimeframe (which has been converted to 20 calendar days) for taking specificactions to solicit action and refer a case for further location attempts,if necessary. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>We were asked to clarify that a case record may be automated,on paper, or a combination thereof. <T3>Response: </T3>We moved from proposed andSection; 303.2(b) to andSection;303.2(c) the requirement that a case record must be supplemented with allinformation and documents pertaining to the case, as well as all relevantfacts, dates, actions taken, contacts made and results in a case. Recordsof contacts, communications, and other actions in a case may be maintainedin a physical or electronic record. Case records, therefore, may be automated,on paper, or a combination thereof. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received comments which indicated that if necessaryforms for case processing are not complete when received by the IV-D agency,the IV-D agency should be allowed to  return the forms to the IV-A agencyor non-AFDC applicant for completion before opening a case. <T3>Response: </T3>As required under andSection; 303.2(b), the IV-D agencymust open a case and solicit necessary and relevant information from thecustodial parent and other relevant sources within the 20-calendar daytimeframe. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received a number of comments in response to the solicitationof views about the possibility of requiring State IV-D agencies to haveagreements in place to ensure that all cases are referred within a specifiednumber of working days of an application or determination of eligibilityfor AFDC, Foster Care or Medicaid benefits. Although a few commenters supportedsuch a requirement, the majority strongly objected to placing an additionalburden on the IV-D agency to ensure compliance by IV-A agencies with IV-Arequirements. The commenters said that regulations governing the IV-A,IV-E and XIX programs should require those program agencies to promptlyrefer cases to the IV-D agency. <T3>Response:</T3> While we agree that requiring  agreements  to  ensure that IV-D agencies receive referrals is an indirect, inappropriate methodof ensuring prompt referral, we are not addressing prompt referral by otheragencies because these issues are beyond the scope of this regulation whichgoverns IV-D agency activities. 5. <T3>Comment:</T3> A number of commenters requested that we extend to 30days the proposed 15-working day timeframe for soliciting additional informationto allow rescheduling of interviews and to allow group interviews. Othersasked that States be required to develop a plan of service within the proposed15-day timeframe. Some commenters requested that the timeframe be reducedto 15 calendar days while others asked that IV-D agencies only be requiredto initiate action to solicit information, verification or access to automatedlocation sources within the proposed 15-day timeframe. <T3>Response:</T3> We believe that 20 calendar days, as required in andSection;303.2(b) to solicit additional information, including to schedule, andreschedule interviews, if necessary, is adequate in the vast majority ofcases. While we have not imposed an explicit requirement that IV-D agenciesdevelop a plan of service within this initial assessment period, actionsrequired within the 20 calendar day timeframe must be based on an assessmentof the case to determine necessary action. In addition, while we believereducing the timeframe to 15 calendar days would be excessive at this time,requiring IV-D agencies only to initiate the required actions during the20 calendar day timeframe would not ensure the case will be worked promptly. 6. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received a number of comments expressing confusionabout the two separate timeframes for accessing automated versus all otherlocation sources. Commenters asked that we not establish a separate timeframefor accessing automated location sources. <T3>Response:</T3> In response to these comments and to avoid confusion,we have deleted the proposed requirement that IV-D agencies access allappropriate State and local automated sources within the proposed 15-daytimeframe from receipt of referral or application. Section 303.3 now containsall location requirements. Therefore, andSection; 303.2(b) now requires IV-Dagencies, within no more than 20 calendar days of receipt of referral ofa case or filing of an application for services, to open a case by establishinga case record and, based on an assessment of the case to determine necessaryaction, to: (1) Solicit necessary and relevant information from the custodialparent and other relevant sources and initiate verification of information,if necessary; and (2) If there is inadequate location information to proceedwith the case, refer the case for further location attempts, as specifiedin andSection; 303.2.Location of Absent Parents_Section 303.3 <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 303.3(a)_Definition </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>With respect to the proposed definition of location,the majority of the commenters requested clarification of the word ``confirmed.''Some commenters requested that we not require confirmation of a locationif there is every indication that the information is current. Commentersgenerally agreed that finding an address should not be considered locatingthe absent parent unless the agency can take necessary action or effectservice of process on the individual based on the address. Finally, commentersrequested clarification regarding the inclusion of the absent parent'semployer, assets and/or income in the definition of location. <T3>Response: </T3>As stated in the preamble to the proposed rule, theadvisory committee stressed that the location function can only be consideredcomplete or successful when the address received is sufficient and necessaryto take the next appropriate action in a case. The definition of locationis important because many of the timeframes in the regulation begin withlocation. While a sufficient address is a prerequisite to effective serviceof process, to define location as successful service of process would requireservice of process within the location function, which is not necessarilyappropriate in every case. States should determine whether an address issufficient to proceed with necessary action, which could include serviceof process. Verification of an address would not be necessary in a situationwhere the State knows the address is sufficient to take the next appropriateaction. At such time as it is determined that service of process cannotbe effected because the information is not sufficient to take the nextappropriate action, the case would be referred for additional locationattempts.  With respect to the request for clarification of why employer and assetinformation is included in the definition of location, we want to clarifythat States must locate the absent parent, the absent parent's employer,income and assets, depending on what information is necessary to proceedwith appropriate action on a case. Section 303.3(a) is revised to removethe word ``confirmed'' and define location as information concerning thephysical whereabouts of the absent parent, or the absent parent's employer,sources of income or assets, as appropriate, which is sufficient and necessaryto take the next appropriate action in the case.<ITAG tagnum="81">Section 303.3(b)(1)_Location Sources </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received several comments regarding the list of appropriateState agencies and departments States must use to locate absent parentsin proposed paragraph (b)(3). The commenters were concerned about the existingrequirement to use departments which maintain records of criminal records.The commenters stated that some States would require legislative changesto access these records. Some commenters suggested that we eliminate thelist in this section and require States to develop guidelines determiningsources to be used in the State so that States will have the flexibilityto use sources allowable under State law and the ability to add new sourcesto the list which can be accessed in one State but not another (e.g., utilityaccount information, financial institution records, etc.). <T3>Response: </T3>The proposed regulation only added wages and employmentrecords to the existing list of State sources; access to criminal recordswas included in existing regulations. We did not delete specific referenceto locate sources and require States to issue guidelines to determine appropriatelocation sources because we want to ensure States access all appropriatesources. However, because we combined all location sources, the State sourceslisted in proposed (b)(3), as well as the Federal Parent Locator Service(PLS) and interstate location networks, are included under paragraph (b)(1).States should access any appropriate location source, whether in or out-of-State,including the Federal PLS. However, because some States may not have accessto certain sources because of restrictions in State law, paragraph (b)(1)requires States to use State location sources such as those listed as permittedunder State law. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>In response to our request regarding whether States shouldbe required or encouraged to use private automated data sources such ascredit reporting agencies and the Postal Service contractor's recent moverdata base, those who responded-favored requiring the use of credit reportingagencies but pointed out that some States may need legislative changesto access this source. Commenters were opposed to requiring use of thePostal Service contractor's recent mover data base unless it could be accessedvia the Federal PLS. The majority of the commenters urged a demonstrationproject to assess the cost-effectiveness of this source. <T3>Response: </T3>In response to comments, we are not requiring use ofthese private data sources at this time. However, States should assessthe availability of these sources and use them, if available and appropriate.Federal financial participation is available for the cost of using thesesources. OCSE will further explore both sources as part of continuing assessmentand enhancement of the Federal PLS. <ITAG tagnum="81">Sections 303.3(b)(3)_Timeframe for Location </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters requested that proposedparagraph (b)(4) require that ``appropriate location sources'' includethe Federal PLS. These commenters were opposed to the exclusion of theFederal PLS from a timeframe, as proposed, and requested that regulationsrequire that States submit requests to the Federal PLS simultaneously withsubmittal to State and local sources. In addition, several commenters statedthat regulations should require a timeframe within which the Federal PLSmust respond.<T3>Response: </T3>Since State and local sources often provide more recentand accurate location information, requests to the Federal PLS may notbe appropriate in many cases. However, we agree that cases should be transmittedto the Federal PLS in a timely manner if and when a State determines thatthe Federal PLS is an appropriate source. Accordingly, we have deletedproposed paragraph (b)(5) and revised proposed paragraph (b)(4), whichis redesignated as paragraph (b)(3), to require referral to the FederalPLS within the timeframe for accessing appropriate location sources. Casesmay be submitted to the Federal PLS and other location sources simultaneously,or to the Federal PLS after accessing State and local sources is unsuccessful,whichever is appropriate given the case information. However, all appropriatesources must be used within the required timeframe. We did not include a timeframe within which the Federal PLS will respondto requests for location because Federal regulations for the IV-D programapply to States, not the Federal government. However, depending on thesources checked, the Federal PLS responds in one, two or three weeks fromrequest for location from a State or local PLS. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters requested clarificationof the term ``access'' in proposed paragraph (b)(3). These commenters requestedthat regulations require that States query sources within the timeframe,rather than require receipt of information from sources within the timeframe,because State agencies often have no control over the time it takes toget a response from sources. One commenter suggested that, rather thanrequire the return of information within a stringent timeframe, Statesshould be encouraged to work with sources to improve turn-around time andbe required only to query sources within a timeframe and follow-up withina certain period of time if the IV-D agency has not received a responsefrom the source. Commenters were also concerned about the 30-working day timeframe. Severalcommenters requested that we retain the current 60-calendar day timeframebecause a 30-working day timeframe would force States to send simultaneouslocation requests to sources which may have a fast response time but maynot have information pertaining to the case. Several commenters statedthat 30 working days is not long enough to receive and evaluate responsesfrom non-automated sources. Suggested alternate timeframes were 30, 40and 45 calendar days. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe it is crucial for States to determine whichsources are most likely to provide information concerning the absent parent'sor alleged father's whereabouts and to access these sources simultaneously,rather than one at a time. With regard to response time, we recognize thatStates do not have direct control over the response time of some sources.However, many sources respond in a timely manner. As stated in the preambleto the proposed rule, the 60-day timeframe was reduced to 30 working daysbased on the fact that the 60-day timeframe was set in 1978, prior to automatedaccess. However, as pointed out by commenters, all States do not yet haveautomated capabilities. While only requiring States to access (i.e., queryor request location information), as opposed to receive responses from,location sources would not ensure continuing responsibility for case processing,we realize that even the most diligent efforts may not result in accessingand evaluating location information within a 30-working day timeframe.The majority of the commenters believed that 60 calendar days would beadequate to request and receive responses from sources. However, becausesome States do not yet have automated access to location sources, FederalPLS access is included in the timeframe, and States must ensure that thelocation information is sufficient, we have revised the proposed paragraph(b)(4) (redesignated as paragraph (b)(3)) to extend 30 working days to75 calendar days. Within this timeframe, States must access all appropriatelocations sources, including the Federal PLS, and ensure the sufficiencyof the information received. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter requested clarification of the locationrequirements with regard to situations in which a State receives informationwhich indicates that an absent parent may be in one of several States.<T3>Response: </T3>With regard to these situations, a State may requestseveral States to attempt to locate an absent parent or putative father.However, because the case is not yet an interstate case, the requestingState must take this action within its own timeframe (i.e., the requestingState must request and receive location information from any other Stateswithin the 75-day timeframe). Since the States providing location informationare not subject to the timeframe, access should be limited to automatedsources to ensure a quick response to the request. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>A number of commenters were concerned that, if, as proposed,States are required to initiate the next appropriate action within 2 workingdays of location, they would have insufficient time to complete the necessaryforms in interstate cases. <T3>Response: </T3>Because we deleted the 2-day timeframe for initiationof the next appropriate action in proposed paragraph (b)(6), we revisedandSection; 303.7(b)(2), which requires initiating states to ``promptly''refer any interstate lV-D case to the responding State's interstate centralregistry for action, to require referral within 20 calendar days of determiningthat the absent parent or putative father is in another State. Under thisrequirement, the initiating State would prepare the appropriate standardinterstate form(s) and forward the case to the responding State's centralregistry. For example, if the State determines an absent parent or putativefather is in another State and the next appropriate step is establishmentof an order, the initiating State would prepare the necessary forms andforward the case to the responding State within 20 calendar days from determiningthat the absent parent is in another State. Upon receipt of the case inthe responding State's central registry, the requirements in andSection;303.7(a) apply. Once the case is forwarded for necessary action by thecentral registry within the 10-working day requirement, the timeframesfor taking each necessary action, in this case establishment of a supportorder, must be met by the responding State. We also corrected referencesin proposed paragraph (b)(7) (redesignated as paragraph (b)(4)) becauseof other changes to andSection; 303.3. <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 303.3(b)(5)_Repeated Location Attempts </ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received a number of comments on the requirement inproposed paragraph (b)(8) that States must repeat location attempts quarterlyin appropriate cases in which previous attempts to locate absent parents,or sources of income and/or assets have failed but adequate informationexists to meet requirements for submittal for location, in conjunctionwith quarterly updates of State employment security files. The majorityof the commenters requested that this requirement only apply if the Statereceives new information on a case since the last request for location.Several commenters requested that regulations clarify that this requirementonly applies to automated sources and to cases where there is a known SocialSecurity number. One commenter requested clarification regarding the statementthat it must be ``in conjunction with quarterly updates of State employmentsecurity files.'' Finally, several commenters requested that resubmittalonly be required semiannually because not all sources are updated quarterly.<T3>Response: </T3>It is essential that cases be resubmitted for locationeven if the State IV-D agency does not receive new information on the case.Often, the agency would not be aware of the fact that an absent parenthas gotten a job or a driver's license. However, we agree that subsequentattempts will not be helpful unless there is sufficient identifying informationon the absent parent. We required in the proposed rule that the State repeatlocation attempts quarterly ``in conjunction with quarterly updates toState employment files'' to ensure that States re-check this invaluablesource after it is updated. Moreover, limiting cases to those with socialsecurity numbers (SSNs) is inappropriate because social security numbersare obtainable through the Federal PLS. For the reasons mentioned above, we have revised proposed paragraph (b)(8)(which is redesignated as paragraph (b)(5)) in several ways. We revisedthe requirement so that States must repeat location attempts in cases inwhich previous attempts to locate have failed but adequate identifyingand other information exists to meet requirements for submittal for location,either quarterly or upon receipt of new information which would aid inlocation, whichever occurs sooner. Quarterly attempts may be limited toautomated location sources but must include accessing State employmentsecurity files. Repeated attempts upon receipt of new information whichmay aid in location must meet the requirements at andSection; 303.3(b)(3),i.e., the State must access all appropriate sources within the 75-calendarday timeframe. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>In response to our request for comments on requiringannual submittal of unlocated cases to the Federal PLS, the majority ofthe commenters requested that, rather than require annual submittal tothe Federal PLS, regulations should require that the FPLS retain casesand check them periodically without the need for resubmittal. <T3>Response: </T3>If the Federal PLS were to check cases periodicallyas suggested without resubmittal, there would be no way to keep the dataup-to-date. For example, the Federal PLS would have no way of knowing ifinformation provided to the State was successful in locating the absentparent or if the absent parent had been located using other location sources.The list of cases, would, therefore, continue to grow from year to year.Since, however, the Federal PLS is such a valuable location source, webelieve mandatory annual submittal to the Federal PLS of unlocated casesin which adequate information exists to access the Federal PLS is warranted.Therefore, we have added such a requirement at paragraph (b)(6). <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 303.3(b)(7)_Referral for Location When Location Becomes Unknown</ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters stated that 5 workingdays is too short a period of time to refer for location services whenlocation becomes unknown. In addition, several commenters requested clarificationof this requirement because it could be interpreted that a State wouldhave to locate the absent parent's assets or income if unknown even ifthe case is in payment status. <T3>Response: </T3>Because we have eliminated all interim timeframes andbecause the timeframe for the location requirement starts upon determiningthat location is necessary, we have deleted this section.Establishment of Support Obligations_Section 303.41. <T3>Comment:</T3> The majority of the commenters were opposed to the 30-workingday timeframe to establish a support order or file a petition for establishmentof a support order with the court or administrative authority responsiblefor establishment of obligations. Most stated that 60 calendar days wouldbe more reasonable to allow the State sufficient time to request that theabsent parent come in for an interview, attempt settlement, prepare a completepetition and refer the case to the attorney if settlement is not reached.Many commenters pointed out that the 30-day timeframe would force Statesto file cases without attempting consent.In addition, many commenters requested clarification regarding the proposedstandard and timeframe as it relates to service of process and expeditedprocesses timeframes. Some States indicated their procedures require thatlegal actions must be filed prior to any negotiations or settlement discussionsbeing taken in the State. Alternatively, some States attempt to obtainconsent orders prior to filing a case. Commenters stated that because ofdiffering State procedures, the proposed requirement to establish an orderor file a petition for establishment of a support order with the courtor administrative authority within 30 days of locating the absent parentshould be revised and/or clarified. Some commenters suggested a separatetimeframe for consent processes, to encompass the period of time priorto when a case must be filed in the State. Other commenters suggested thatthe timeframe for filing a case be shortened and that another timeframebe added for the establishment of an order and/or initiation of establishmentof an order. Most commenters indicated that filing a case does not bringthe absent parent under the jurisdiction of the expedited process system.Rather, it is service of process that must be accomplished to ensure thatthe absent parent is under the jurisdiction of the State's expedited processsystem.With regard to service of process, the majority of the commenters wereopposed to the requirements in proposed andSection; 303.9. With regard toproposed andSection; 303.9(b), commenters stated that 2 working days is notadequate time to prepare documents for service and to refer documents tothe process server. With regard to the requirement that service of processmust be completed within 10 working days of the request, commenters weremost concerned with the fact that even service of process by certifiedmail takes longer than 10 days. In addition, the majority of commenterswere concerned with the assumption in the preamble to the proposed rulethat the percentage of cases where process could not be served would beaccounted for in the 25% margin for error in a 75% audit criteria. Commenterspointed out that despite diligent efforts, absent parents successfullyavoid service in a sufficiently large percentage of cases to warrant thisfact to be taken into consideration in developing a standard. Commentersrequested that regulations state that States attempt service within a timeframeand document attempts to show what efforts were taken if an absent parentis not successfully served. Many commenters requested that the 10-day timeframebe extended to allow for due process requirements which may require serviceby mail to be followed by personal service if necessary. Suggested timeframesincluded 15, 20, 30 and 45 calendar days. Finally, commenters requestedthat service of process timeframes be outside of the overall timeframesfor action. Rather, these commenters believed that service of process timeframesshould be in addition to overall timeframes, and that expedited processesrequirements should be revised accordingly.<T3>Response:</T3> As required in andSection; 303.101, States must have anduse expedited processes to establish and enforce support obligations. Thoseexpedited processes and the timeframes in andSection; 303.101 only applyto cases once they are under administrative or judicial jurisdiction. Asstated in the preamble to the proposed rule, the proposed case processingtimeframes for establishment of support obligations were intended to encompassall necessary actions up to the point where the expedited processes timeframesbegin (i.e., the date a case is filed or the date of successful serviceof process, depending on which date the State chooses for purposes of computingexpedited processes timeframes.) However, as a result of comments, we realizethat many States must file a document with the court or administrativeprocess before any action can be taken to establish a support obligationand that cases are not under administrative or judicial jurisdiction untilthe absent parent has been served with notice. To respond to the commenters'concerns, we believe it is necessary to revise both andSection;andSection;303.4 and 303.101.Section 303.101(b)(2) is revised by replacing reference to the time offiling as the starting point for the expedited processing timeframe sothat, under expedited processes, actions to establish and enforce supportobligations must be completed from the date of successful service of processto the time of disposition within the required timeframes. In conjunctionwith this revision, andSection; 303.4(d) is revised to encompass the periodof time from location of the absent parent or establishment of paternitythrough establishment of an order, successful service of process, or documentedattempts to serve process in accordance with State guidelines definingdiligent efforts to effect service of process. To ensure States make diligentefforts to serve process, we added a requirement at andSection; 303.3(c)to require that the State develop guidelines defining diligent effortsfor service of process and that the guidelines must include periodicallyrepeating service of process attempts in cases in which previous attemptsto serve process have failed, but adequate identifying and other informationexists to attempt service of process. Therefore, within the timeframe tobe discussed below, States must serve process or document attempts to serveprocess. In situations where process could not be served because the absentparent is no longer at the address, the State must document this as thereason and the case must be resubmitted for location.Because State procedures differ with respect to the order in which actionsare taken to establish an order for support, rather than attempt to establishsequential timeframes for each step a State must take, we have extendedthe timeframe sufficiently to allow a State to attempt to establish anorder by consent, or file an action and serve the absent parent in accordancewith its procedures. As indicated above, the majority of the commentersstated that 60 calendar days would be adequate for a State to attempt toestablish an order by consent or refer the case to an attorney, preparea complete petition and file the case. In addition, the majority of thecommenters indicated that 30 calendar days would be a reasonable periodof time in which to accomplish both service by mail and personal service,if necessary. Accordingly, andSection; 303.4(d) requires that IV-D agenciesmust establish an order for support or serve process necessary to commenceproceedings to establish an order or document unsuccessful attempts toserve process within 90 calendar days of location or of establishment ofpaternity. Therefore, given the 20-day timeframe for case opening, the75-day timeframe for location and the 90-day timeframe discussed above,support orders must be established or cases must enter the expedited processessystem within 185 calendar days of application or referral. We want topoint out that this approach allows establishing an order by consent atany time in case processing, whether before or after a case is filed withthe court or administrative authority. With respect to interstate cases,the timeframes in andSection; 303.4 apply upon receipt by the agency in theresponding State responsible for the establishment of support obligations.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> Many commenters requested that regulations allow Statesto determine whether cases should be pursued. Examples included: the absentparent is receiving public assistance or SSI; the absent parent is incarceratedor institutionalized without income or assets; and the absent parent'sincome level is below the minimum set by State law.<T3>Response:</T3> While some discretion is necessary, States must havestandards for pursuing cases. Those situations mentioned in the commentsas set forth above would be accounted for by applying the State's guidelinesfor setting support awards.3. <T3>Comment:</T3> The majority of the commenters requested that regulationsspecify when and how often States must review dismissals without prejudiceas well as what documentation is necessary.<T3>Response: </T3>In this situation, we believe States are in a betterposition to determine when to refile a previously dismissed case or whento seek a support order on a case-by-case basis. However, we have clarifiedthat States must, at the time of dismissal, determine when it would beappropriate to pursue an order in the future. Notations in the case recordare sufficient documentation. If a case is dismissed because of unemploymentor insufficient income, the State should return the case to the ``locate''function for quarterly and annual checks on changes in income and assets.Establishment of Paternity_Section 303.5 1. <T3>Comment: </T3>In response to our request for comments regarding whetherthere should be separate timeframes and requirements for uncontested paternitycases, commenters stated that this would not be practical because oftenit is difficult to differentiate between contested and uncontested paternitycases. Commenters pointed out that uncontested cases could become contestedand vice versa at various points in case processing. Most commenters believedthat separate timeframes would only complicate the process or increasecourt actions to establish paternity if the deadline for establishmentby consent was missed. <T3>Response: </T3>While we have not required separate timeframes for uncontestedcases, we strongly urge States to attempt to establish paternity by voluntaryacknowledgement immediately upon location of the alleged father. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Many commenters were concerned with the statement inthe preamble that cases which are difficult or impossible to complete withinone year would easily be accounted for within the 25 percent margin allowedas part of the 75 percent substantial compliance audit standard. Commentersrequested that regulations allow States to exercise prosecutorial discretionor, at the very least, list categories of cases which should be excludedfrom the timeframe. Commenters also described unavoidable delays whichcause proceedings to extend beyond the one-year timeframe despite diligentefforts on behalf of the IV-D agency (e.g., extensive pre-trial discovery,interlocutory appeals and post-judgment appeals, etc.). Finally, commentersquestioned our legal authority to establish an outside limit for completionof paternity establishment since the Congress allowed States to excludepaternity establishment from their expedited processes. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that Congress allowed States to exclude paternityestablishment from their expedited processes to ensure that jurisdictionsthat wanted to have judges hear paternity cases were able to do so. Wealso believe that setting standards for paternity establishment is wellwithin the Secretary's rulemaking authority. In response to commenters' concerns, however, we have revised the proposedtimeframe to take into consideration the more difficult paternity establishmentcase and to allow for differences in State procedures with regard to paternityestablishment. Rather than outline step-by-step standards and timeframesfor when in the process a State must file a petition with the court forpaternity establishment, attempt to establish paternity by consent andserve the alleged father, we have revised the regulations to ensure thatall actions necessary to initiate and complete legal proceedings to establishpaternity are accomplished in a timely manner. Section 303.5(a)(1) is revised to require, under paragraph (1), that, within90 calendar days of locating the alleged father, the IV-D agency must filea petition for paternity establishment or complete service of process necessaryto establish paternity (or document unsuccessful attempts to serve processin accordance with the State's guidelines defining diligent efforts underandSection; 303.3(c)), whichever occurs later in accordance with State proceduresfor paternity establishment. Paragraph (a)(2) requires that paternity mustbe established (or the alleged father excluded by genetic tests and/orlegal process) within one year of the later of: (i) Successful serviceof process; or, (ii) the child reaching 6 months of age. Under this requirement,States may establish paternity by acknowledgment or consent and, accordingto State procedures, a support obligation, at any time during the processingof the case. This expanded timeframe allows States 3 months to serve processor file a petition for paternity establishment and one year to establishpaternity from successful service, unless the child is under 6 months oldand therefore too young for bloodtesting when process is served, in whichcase the State has one year from the child's 6-month birthday to establishpaternity. We believe the extension of the paternity establishment timeframe addressescommenters' concerns about those contested cases which cannot be completedwithin one year of locating the putative father. One year from successfulservice of process or the child being 6 months old is a reasonable amountof time to allow for completion of the great preponderance of paternitycases. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of commenters requested that regulationstake into consideration the fact that despite the alleged father beinglocated prior to or immediately after the birth of the child, blood cannotbe drawn from infants for certain tests until a child is at least six monthsold. <T3>Response: </T3>In response to comments, we have revised paragraph (a)to state that the one-year timeframe for paternity establishment beginswith successful service of process or of the child being six months old,whichever occurs later. This will allow States to serve process on theputative father as soon as possible after the child is born when the putativefather is more likely to be responsive because the timeframe for paternityestablishment will not begin until the child is old enough for a bloodtest. However, in the future we intend to reexamine the use of DNA testingwhich does not require the child to be six months old. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters were opposed to the proposedrequirement that alleged fathers may only be excluded as a result of genetictests. Commenters pointed out that in many States genetic tests alone arenot sufficient to establish or refute paternity. In addition, evidenceor lack of evidence may exclude the alleged father without the need foror despite genetic tests. <T3>Response: </T3>We recognize that a putative father may be excludedas a result of either genetic tests or court action and we have revisedparagraph (a)(1) (redesignated as paragraph (a)(2)) to state that withinthe timeframe, the State must establish paternity or exclude the allegedfather as a result of genetic tests and/or legal process.5. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters requested clarification of the term``genetic tests.'' <T3>Response: </T3>We replaced ``blood tests'' with ``genetic tests'' tomore accurately reflect the advancements in, and increased refinement of,testing methods to determine paternity. We want to point out, however,that ``genetic'' tests include any blood or tissue testing processes usedto confirm or exclude parentage. 6. <T3>Comment:</T3> The majority of commenters were opposed to the requirementin proposed paragraph (a)(2) that, in any case in which an alleged fatheris excluded but more than one alleged father is identified, the IV-D agencymust meet the requirements for each alleged father identified. Commenterswere concerned because of evidentiary problems with cases involving morethan one alleged father. Some States indicated that they are prohibitedby State law from bringing action against a second alleged father whenthe custodial parent has filed a paternity establishment action naminganother man. In addition, commenters believed that States should be requiredto pursue the most ``likely'' alleged father in order to protect the custodialparent's credibility as a witness. <T3>Response:</T3> We have retained the requirement in proposed paragraph(a)(2), which has been redesignated as paragraph (a)(3), because all childrenare entitled to have their paternity established. It is imperative thatStates establish procedures which permit paternity establishment even ifthe custodial parent names more than one possible alleged father. Bloodtests prior to filing the action, or petitions alleging intercourse witheach possible father and naming two or more defendants may minimize theevidentiary programs identified. We also want to clarify that when thereis more than one alleged father named, if one alleged father is excluded,the timeframes for paternity establishment would apply for the next allegedfather once he is located and served. 7. <T3>Comment:</T3> We received several comments with regard to the requirementin proposed paragraph (c) that IV-D agencies must identify and use throughcompetitive procurement laboratories which perform, at reasonable cost,tests which tend to identify the father or exclude the alleged father.Commenters requested clarification regarding whether States may contractwith more than one laboratory for different tests. In addition, commentersrequested that regulations allow States to take into consideration accessibilityand timeliness of results in choosing a lab. <T3>Response:</T3> As stated in the preamble to the proposed rule, we wantto avoid situations where States use laboratories at exorbitant cost whenthere may be a laboratory available which performs comparable testing atmore reasonable cost. Within those parameters, States may evaluate servicesprovided by laboratories, and choose one or more laboratories which providenecessary services at reasonable cost. Accessibility and timeliness maybe considered in determining choice of laboratory but not to the degreethat costs become exorbitant in comparison to other laboratories. Enforcement of Support Obligations_Section 303.6 1. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters were opposed to the requirementthat States must identify on the date the parent fails to make paymentsin an amount equal to the support payable for one month, or an earlierdate in accordance with State law, those cases in which there is a failureto comply with the support obligation. Commenters believe that this requirementis too stringent because it entails daily monitoring. <T3>Response:</T3> Effective and timely monitoring of compliance is essentialin order to trigger income withholding in accordance with statutory requirementsand to ensure timely use of other enforcement techniques as appropriate.Because section 466(b)(3) of the Act requires that an absent parent becomesubject to withholding and that advance notice be sent to the absent parenton the date on which the parent fails to make payments in an amount equalto the support payable for one month, States must identify delinquenciesimmediately in all cases. Therefore, we have not revised this requirement.2. <T3>Comment:</T3> We specifically requested comments on whether the requirementfor sending notice to a delinquent absent parent should be amended from``the State must take steps * * * to send notice on the day'' to ``sendthe advance notice on the day the delinquency reaches one month's support.''The majority of commenters were opposed to tightening this requirement.In fact, many commenters suggested that the requirement be revised to requirethat States send the notice within a longer timeframe. Suggestions included3 days, 5 days and 1 week. <T3>Response:</T3> As previously stated, section 466(b)(3) of the Act requiresthat advance notice of the withholding be sent to the absent parent onthe date on which the parent fails to make payments in an amount equalto the support payable for one month. Therefore, we cannot extend thistimeframe. However, providing notice on the date the absent parent is delinquentmay be impossible in all cases. Therefore, we are retaining the currentrequirement to take steps to send the notice on that date. 3. <T3>Comment:</T3> In response to our request for comments, the majorityof the commenters believed that regulations should not require that Statesprocess uncontested wage withholding cases more quickly than contestedcases. <T3>Response:</T3> Current requirements at andSection; 303.100(d)(2) requirenotice to the employer to be sent immediately if the absent parent failsto contact the State within the period specified in the advance notice.Because we are establishing specific timeframes for taking actions in IV-Dcases, we replaced ``immediately'' with ``within 5 working days'' in andSection;303.100(d)(2).4. <T3>Comment: </T3>In response to our request for comment regarding whetherwage withholding notices to employers should inform the employer when enrollmentin employment-based medical insurance has been required by the supportorder, whether the IV-D agency should request the employer to alert theIV-D agency if the absent parent has not enrolled the child(ren), and whetherthe IV-D agency should request the employer to enroll the child(ren) ifthe absent parent has not, the majority of commenters indicated that noneof the above suggestions are appropriate or within the scope of State laws.Commenters also pointed out that requiring these actions could potentiallyharm working relationships with employers at precisely the time when cooperationis necessary for effective wage withholding procedures. <T3>Response: </T3>Because of possible conflicts with State law, we havenot added these requirements. We want to clarify, however, that the requirementin andSection; 303.6 to take appropriate enforcement action includes situationswhere there is noncompliance with an order requiring health insurance coverage.In accordance with andSection; 303.31(b)(7) (formerly andSection; 306.51(b)(7)),if health insurance is available to the absent parent at reasonable costand has not been obtained at the time the order is entered, the State musttake steps to enforce the health insurance coverage required by the supportorder. 5. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters stated that the requirement that States mustinitiate any other enforcement techniques as appropriate within 30 workingdays of identifying a delinquency would not allow sufficient time to verifyan address for service of process, gather enough information to refer thecase to an attorney, prepare the case for trial and prepare interrogatories.In addition, commenters requested clarification of ``initiate'' for purposesof meeting the timeframe when the State uses administrative procedures,such as debt collection agencies and telephone collection techniques. Thesecommenters were concerned that this requirement implies that States mustfile a petition for enforcement because there would not be sufficient timeto allow for calling the absent parent in or using other techniques notincluded in the mandatory techniques specified in andSection; 302.70(a).Response: Because States must have and use expedited processes for theenforcement of child support obligations, we believe it is necessary torevise andSection; 303.6 for consistency with the changes to the expeditedprocesses timeframe starting date discussed previously. It is essentialthat cases enter expedited processes as soon as the State obtains necessaryjurisdiction over the absent parent to allow enforcement of the supportobligation. However, we believe it is also necessary to account for situationsin which States attempt to enforce obligations by consent or using otheradministrative enforcement techniques before filing a petition for enforcementof a support obligation. Section 303.6(c)(2) is revised to require thatthe State take any appropriate enforcement action (except income withholdingand Federal and State income tax refund offset) unless service of processis necessary, within no later than 30 calendar days of identifying a delinquencyor other support-related noncompliance with the order or location of theabsent parent, whichever occurs later. When service of process is necessaryprior to taking an enforcement action, service must be completed (or unsuccessfulattempts to serve process must be documented in accordance with the State'sguidelines under andSection; 303.3(c)) and enforcement action taken, if processis served, within no later than 60 calendar days of identifying a delinquencyor other support related noncompliance with the order or location of theabsent parent, whichever occurs later. Therefore, within this timeframe,States may enforce support obligations by consent, use of administrativeprocedures such as debt collection, telephone contact, demand letters,or publication of names, for example, and/or file a petition to enforceby legal action. Accomplishing enforcement by consent would be allowableat any time. The date of successful service of process would then be thedate when expedited timeframes commence. We want to point out that Statesare not required to use a specific enforcement technique if that techniqueis determined to be inappropriate in accordance with the guidelines allowedin andSection; 302.70(b).6. <T3>Comment: </T3>With regard to the requirement that States must submitonce a year, all cases which meet the certification requirements for Stateand/or Federal income tax refund offset, commenters were most concernedabout complying with this requirement before States are fully automated.Commenters pointed out that often collections from prior years would notbe all received or applied before it would be time to certify again. Inaddition, commenters were concerned that requiring certification does notgive the custodial parent an opportunity to object to the action. Finally,commenters also requested that we clarify which State, in an interstatecase, is required to submit past-due support for Federal income tax refundoffset. <T3>Response: </T3>In response to State concerns that amounts offset fromprior years may not be received or applied by the date States are requiredto submit amounts for Federal income tax refund offset, past-due supportsubmitted for offset must meet the certification requirements for Federalincome tax refund offset, under which the State must verify the amountof past-due support. If the State cannot assure that the past-due supportis the correct amount owed, submittal is not required. However, given thetimeframe for transmission of offset collection information from OCSE tothe States and the schedule for submission of the next round of certificationsfrom the States to OCSE, such situations should be the exception ratherthan the rule. With respect to custodial parents' right to refuse to havepast-due support submitted for offset, we reiterate our longstanding positionthat, when an individual receives IV-D services, they may not dictate whichservices they receive. Tax refund offset has proven to be a very successfulenforcement technique and its use is essential to ensure children receivethe support they deserve. With respect to the question about which State in an interstate, non-AFDCcase may submit past-due support for Federal income tax refund offset,in accordance with andSection; 303.72(a)(4), the State in which an applicationfor IV-D services has been filed pursuant to andSection; 302.33, (i.e., theinitiating State), must submit the past-due support for offset. This isconsistent with the requirement that past-due support owed in AFDC casesmust be submitted by the State in which there is an assignment of supportrights to the State under andSection; 232.11, (in interstate cases, generallythe initiating State). It is necessary to specify which State must submitpast-due support owed in non-AFDC cases for Federal tax refund offset toavoid both States submitting the same arrearages. The initiating Stateis in the best position to pay the custodial parent any amount offset quicklyand to handle any necessary adjustments to the amount of offset based onan amended tax return. 7. <T3>Comment: </T3>The majority of the commenters requested clarificationregarding the requirement in proposed paragraph (c)(4) that in cases whereprevious enforcement attempts have been unsuccessful, the State must examinethe factors quarterly and initiate appropriate enforcement techniques asappropriate. <T3>Response: </T3>As stated in the preamble to the proposed rule, thisrequirement was added to ensure that States keep abreast of case circumstancesso that when the potential for resumed enforcement efforts occurs, Stateswould initiate appropriate enforcement techniques. We do not intend thatState re-exercise enforcement techniques which are inappropriate givencase circumstances or attempt enforcement when circumstances which causedinitially unproductive enforcement attempts have not changed. For clarity,we have revised paragraph (c)(4) to require that, in cases in which enforcementattempts have been unsuccessful, the State must, at the time an attemptto enforce fails, examine the reason the enforcement attempt failed anddetermine when it would be appropriate to take an enforcement action inthe future, and take an enforcement action at that time. When a case cannotbe enforced because of unemployment or insufficient income, the State shouldreturn the case to the ``locate'' function for quarterly and annual checkson changes in income and assets.Procedures for Case Assessment_Section 303.10 <T3>Comment: </T3>We received a number of comments arguing that, becausecases must be processed within the required timeframes, States may notprioritize cases. <T3>Response: </T3>We disagree with these comments. States may establisha case assessment system which meets the requirements of andSection; 303.10and which allows the State to prioritize which cases to work first, withinthe timeframes for case processing. Case prioritization is not a systemto determine which workable cases not to work; case closure criteria inandSection; 303.11 allow States to close cases which have little or no potentialfor success either currently or in the future. Case Closure Criteria_Section 303.11 <ITAG tagnum="81">Section 303.11(b)_Criteria for Case Closure </ITAG>a. <T3>General</T3>_1. <T3>Comment: </T3>Some commenters asked whether a case must be closed ifthe case met one or more of the criteria enumerated in paragraph (b), orwhether States could exercise discretion in opting not to close some caseswhich qualified for closure. <T3>Response: </T3>A State may opt to continue to work a case that otherwisequalifies for closure under paragraph (b) if it believes that there ispotential for success. A State may also elect to establish criteria forclosure which make it harder to close a case than those established inparagraph (b). 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Other commenters proposed that we add a provision underwhich States may close a case which does not fit any criterion establishedin paragraph (b), but in which the State has determined closure is appropriate.<T3>Response: </T3>We have not included this proposal in the regulationbecause it is open-ended and contrary to the purpose of establishing clearand concise standards which preclude premature or inappropriate closingof cases. However we have, elsewhere in this section, modified or expandedthe criteria in response to comments which identified specific areas inaddition to those proposed where closure is appropriate. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters asked if a support order or arrearageswhich accrued under that order are affected when a IV-D case is closed.<T3>Response: </T3>Case closure does not affect the support order or arrearageswhich have accrued under the order; it only means that services under theIV- D program will no longer be provided. Although the IV-D agency closesa case, the support order remains in effect and arrearages continue toaccrue for the life of the order. In accordance with the requirements ofsection 466(a)(9) of the Act and andSection; 303.106, these arrearages arejudgments by operation of law and are subject to enforcement. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters felt that additional time should beallowed for IV-D agencies to establish a case closure system, review existingcases to determine if closure is appropriate, and close cases which meetone or more of the criteria, since case closure was not previously addressedin regulations. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that States can comply with this requirementby October 1, 1990, since States are not required to close all cases whichmeet the criteria. 5. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked that, for audit purposes, any open casemeeting at least one of the closure criteria be considered closed and notaffect the State's performance with regard to substantial compliance. Ina related comment on the audit, the State questioned whether the IV-D agencymust properly close all cases which meet closure criteria, or that allcases closed must meet the criteria. <T3>Response: </T3>The establishment of case closure criteria is designedto limit cases the State may close to those in which there is no reasonableexpectation of establishing paternity, obtaining a support order, or collectingchild or spousal support, either now or in the future. Any case which meetsthe criteria for case closure, as demonstrated by the State during thecourse of the audit, would be considered unworkable and would not countagainst the State for purposes of the audit. For purposes of auditing caseclosure requirements, the auditors will review cases which have been closedto determine if the IV-D agency properly applied the criteria for closure.6. <T3>Comment: </T3>Commenters also suggested that the regulations establisha special category of ``inactive cases'' in order to minimize the administrativecosts associated with the closing and subsequent reopening of certain cases.<T3>Response: </T3>Since States are not required to close all cases meetingcase closure criteria and will not be subject to audit penalties for thosein which no action is currently possible, a ``de facto'' inactive filecan be created since the State is not penalized for its failure to workthese cases. 7. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that the regulations requireStates to submit their proposed criteria to OCSE for approval prior toimplementation.<T3>Response: </T3>States are responsible for meeting requirements in Federalregulations. While States may work with OCSE Regional Offices in developingcase closure systems, we see no necessity for requiring prior approvalof case closure systems. b. <T3>No Current Order_andSection; 303.11(b) (1) and (2)_</T3>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received many comments which were critical of proposedparagraphs (b) (1) and (2) establishing a $150 ceiling of arrearages belowwhich the IV-D agency could close a case when there was no longer a currentsupport order for cases involving both minor children and children whohad reached the age of majority. A number of commenters argued that continuedenforcement in arrears-only cases for arrearages of $150 or more was inmost instances fruitless and not cost-effective. Several of these commentersrecommended an increase in the level below which States could close allcases. Other commenters suggested that a separate $500 limit be appliedto arrearages owed to non-minor children. In addition, we also receivedcomments which recommended that closure be allowed in non-AFDC arrearage-onlycases involving non-minor children where the arrearages accrued when thechild was a minor and before application for IV-D services was made. <T3>Response: </T3>Title IV-D of the Act does not limit application for,or availability of, IV-D services to minor children. Therefore, we cannotpermit States to close non-AFDC arrearage-only cases involving non-minorchildren where the arrearages accrued when the child was a minor and beforeapplication for IV-D service was made. However, in response to comments,we raised the limit on arrearages to $500 in paragraphs (b) (1) and (2).Therefore, paragraph (b)(1) now allows case closure if a child has reachedthe age of majority, there is no current support order and arrearages areunder $500 or unenforceable under State law. Paragraph (b)(2) now allowscase closure if a child has not reached the age of majority, there is nolonger a current support order and arrearages are under $500 or unenforceableunder State law. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Other commenters maintained that, by not allowing closureof arrearage-only cases for non-minors when arrears were above a certainlevel, we were mandating a service in these cases when regulations at andSection;303.1 give the State an option of whether or not to provide services incases in which there are no minor children. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 466(e) of the Act and andSection; 303.1 provideStates the option of whether or not to collect overdue support using themandatory practices in andSection; 302.70 (wage withholding, State incometax offset, etc.) for children who are not minors. These provisions donot allow States to choose not to provide any services in cases in whichthere are no minor children. As discussed above, the State may not refuseto enforce past-due court or administratively-ordered support owed to emancipatedchildren in non-AFDC IV-D cases, unless there is no current support orderand arrearages are under $500 or unenforceable under State law, as discussedabove. 3. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that arrearages under paragraphs(b) (1) and (2) be expanded to include outstanding medical bills for whichthe absent parent is responsible. <T3>Response: </T3>IV-D agencies are required to collect medical supportonly if a specific dollar amount for medical support is designated in theorder. Past-due cash amounts for medical support would be part of the arrearagesaccruing under a support order. 4. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State recommended that we include the death of thechild for whom support was owed as an additional criterion for closing.<T3>Response: </T3>The death of a child would constitute grounds for thetermination of an order for current support. The IV-D agency would theneither close the case under andSection; 303.11(b)(1) or (2) if no arrearageswere owed, or the arrears were below the established ceiling, or continueenforcement until such arrearages are reduced below the established ceiling.If the arrearages accrued pursuant to an order when the child was alive,the absent parent's obligation under that order for past-due support doesnot necessarily end with the death of the child. 5. <T3>Comment: </T3>We also received a suggestion that we include  reconciliationof the custodial and absent parent with no arrearages owed the State asgrounds for case closure. <T3>Response: </T3>As stated in the preamble of the proposed rules, reconciliationis a valid reason for closure under paragraph (b)(2). 6. <T3>Comment: </T3>Another commenter asked that the regulation address casesin which the fact that there is no current order is a temporary condition(i.e., absent parent has no current income) where circumstances may changein the future. <T3>Response: </T3>These cases may not be closed under paragraphs (b) (1)or (2), but should be addressed as part of a State's case prioritizationsystem and reviewed periodically for a change in status. If the absentparent attempts to have the order vacated under these circumstances bythe court or administrative authority which issued the order, the IV-Dagency should argue that the order remain in effect and current paymentsbe held in abeyance or tolled during the period the absent parent is unableto pay. c. <T3>Death of Absent Parent and No Resources Available_andSection; 303.11(b)(3)</T3>_1.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters proposed that cases should be closedif there were no arrearages owed by the deceased parent which had beenassigned to the State. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that this approach would not ensure thatappropriate services are available to the many non-AFDC cases in the IV-Dsystem where there is no assignment to the State. As we noted in the preambleto the proposed rules, delinquent absent parents may have assets whichhe or she has protected from collection procedures, and the parent's deathmay release these assets for collection by the IV-D agency. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter indicated that the law in their State providesthat probate can be filed within three years, and the IV-D agency wouldhave to wait that length of time to ascertain that assets were or werenot available. Another commenter pointed out that it is difficult in thesecircumstances for the State to prove a negative proposition (i.e., thatassets are not available). <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with these comments and have changed the finalrule to allow closure if the State has made documented attempts and failedto identify any assets which could be levied. However, if the IV-D agencyhas identified assets through its search, or the custodial parent has presentedinformation regarding assets which can be verified, the State must keepthe case open if it is possible that the assets can be reached for collection.d. <T3>Unable To Establish Paternity_andSection; 303.11(b)(4)</T3>_1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received many comments on this issue. Several commentersobjected to proposed paragraph (4)(ii) which allows closure if a courtor administrative process has excluded the putative father and no otherputative father can be identified. Some commenters pointed out that ifa genetic test excludes the putative father it would be foolhardy and awaste of public resources to try such cases in court or before an administrativehearing. <T3>Response: </T3>We agree with this position and have inserted the phrase``A genetic test or'' at the beginning of paragraph (4)(ii). 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Another commenter requested that this criterion for closureinclude test results which do not exclude the putative father but indicatea ``low probability'' of paternity, since some courts will not determinepaternity unless there is more compelling evidence to support the claim.<T3>Response:</T3> While such cases are problematic, we do not believethat it is appropriate to use such a subjective standard for closure. Thesecases should be pursued unless a genetic test or a court or administrativeprocess excludes the putative father and no other putative father can beidentified.3. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several other commenters pointed out that paragraph (4)(iii),which allows closure when it is in the best interest of the child, onlyreferences andSection; 303.5(b) which involves paternity cases involvingincest, forcible rape, or where legal adoption proceedings are pending.These commenters pointed out that this definition was inconsistent withthe provisions of andSection; 232.42 which defined good cause for AFDC casesas physical or emotional harm to the child, custodial parent or caretakerrelative.<T3>Response:</T3> Cases which may be closed as a result of a good causefinding under the AFDC program are addressed in andSection; 303.11(b)(10).Section 303.5 includes, for IV-D purposes, a separate definition with respectto paternity establishment cases.e.<T3> Unable To Locate For Three Years_andSection; 303.11(b)(5)_Comment:</T3>We specifically requested comments on this provision which would allowa case to be closed when the absent parent's location is unknown, and theState has made regular attempts over a three-year period, all of whichhave been unsuccessful. Several commenters asked that no time limit beplaced in this criterion for closure, and were concerned that the custodialparent would never be able to prove a change in circumstance to reopena case. Other commenters recommended that the three-year requirement didnot allow enough time for location attempts. Another commenter requestedthat this criterion be deleted and that the regulation mandate that thesecases be maintained in a suspense file with annual locate submissions.We received a parallel number of comments that the three-year requirementwas too long, and that the IV-D agency would be able to determine if locationwas futile after one to two years of regular locate attempts. Other commenterssupported the three-year requirement if quarterly locate attempts are made.<T3>Response:</T3> We have retained the three-year requirement becausewe believe that if adequate information exists to meet the requirementsfor submittal for location, quarterly locate attempts, including thoselisted under andSection; 303.3, over a three-year period are sufficient.Again, States may choose to keep cases open and continue location attemptsfor more than 3 years.f.<T3> Absent Parent Institutionalized or Incarcerated_andSection; 303.11(b)(6)_Comment:</T3>Several commenters maintained that the criterion for closure should includeparents who, although not institutionalized or incarcerated, are unableto pay currently or in the foreseeable future because of total and permanentdisability. In addition, many commenters felt that the five-year limitfor institutionalization and the 12-year limit for incarceration withoutparole were excessive, maintaining that many cases which were unworkablewith extremely low chances for any future collections would be kept openwith a resulting negative impact on the best use of the State's resources.Some felt that the time limits were irrelevant, and that the only testshould be that the absent parent cannot pay for the duration of the child'sminority.<T3>Response:</T3> In response to these comments, we are dropping the five-and 12-year time limits and have added a category where the absent parenthas a medically verified permanent and total disability with no evidenceof support potential. The revised language now reads: The absent parentcannot pay for the duration of the child's minority because the parenthas been institutionalized in a psychiatric facility, is incarcerated withno chance of parole, or has a medically verified total and permanent disabilitywith no evidence of support potential. We have retained the second sentenceregarding income and assets which may be available.g.<T3> Absent Parent Citizen of and Lives in a Foreign Country_andSection;303.11(b)(7)_</T3>1. <T3>Comment:</T3> Two States recommended that the criterion that refersto an absent parent who is a citizen of a foreign country include residentsand members of American Indian tribes living on reservations. These commenterspointed out that in most cases States do not have legal jurisdiction toestablish or enforce child support orders on tribal lands, and for allintents and purposes these cases jurisdictionally resemble a sovereignforeign nation.<T3>Response:</T3> While we realize the difficulty of providing servicesin these cases, we believe that American Indians should not be includedin this category. Indians are American citizens and therefore subject tocertain legal procedures both on and off the reservation. Federal incometax refund offset is available, and income withholding is required if tribalmembers work outside of the reservation. We also encourage States to enterinto cooperative agreements or other arrangements with Tribal entitieswhich would establish jurisdiction for child support matters by the State,or the Tribe acting for the State. In addition, States are not penalizedfor these open cases by auditors, where the Indian absent parent is a residentof and works on a reservation and no means exist to obtain jurisdictionover the absent parent to obtain or enforce a support order. 2. <T3>Comment: </T3>Other commenters felt that if a State was unable to assertpersonal jurisdiction over the absent parent or the absent parent had noreachable domestic income, the case should be closed. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe these cases can still be worked where reciprocitybetween a State and a foreign jurisdiction has been established. h. <T3>Locate Only Cases_andSection; 303.11(b)(8)</T3>_1. <T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter suggested that cases in which a locateonly application has been made be closed only when location services havebeen ``successfully'' completed. <T3>Response: </T3>There is no guarantee that location attempts will besuccessful. <ITAG tagnum="84">Suggested New Criteria </ITAG>i. <T3>Unable To Locate Custodial Parent_andSection; 303.11(b)(11)</T3>_1. <T3>Comment: </T3>We received the greatest number of comments from Stateswho pointed out that they cannot work many cases where the custodial parentwho applied for non-AFDC services can no longer be locatcd despite repeatedattempts to contact the client by the IV-D agency. <T3>Response: </T3>We believe that this is a reasonable criterion for closure,but we are also concerned that such a criterion take into account periodicabsences of custodial parents who may be unavailable due to vacations,business travel or family emergencies. Consequently, we are adding a newparagraph (b)(11) which would allow closure in non-AFDC cases if the IV-Dagency is unable to contact the custodial parent over a 30 calendar dayperiod despite attempts to contact the parent by both phone and letter,including at least one registered letter. The 60-day notice of case closurerequired by paragraph (c) will also allow those parents who want continuingservices to avoid closure by contacting the IV-D agency. j. <T3>Failure To Cooperate by the Non-AFDC Custodial Parent (new) 303.11(b)(12)</T3>_1.<T3>Comment: </T3>We received many comments by States and other organizationswho requested that non-cooperation by the custodial parent (failure toattend hearings, refusal to sign forms, etc.) in non-AFDC cases be addressed.<T3>Response: </T3>In response to these comments, we are establishing anew paragraph (b)(12) which allows closure for non-cooperation in non-AFDCcases, but only when the case file documents the circumstances of the non-cooperationand that an action by the custodial parent is essential for the next stepin providing services. We would also point out that the custodial parentmay avoid closure by responding with the necessary cooperation during the60-day notice period required under paragraph (c). k. <T3>Custodial Parent Moves out of State</T3>_<T3>Comment: </T3>A number of States requested that case closure be allowedwhen the custodial parent moves to another State. <T3>Response: </T3>This is not an appropriate justification for closinga case. There is no residency requirement for provision of IV-D servicesin either the Federal statutes or regulations. More specifically, section454(6) of the Act and andSection; 302.33 require that States must providechild support collection or paternity determination services to any individualnot otherwise eligible for such services upon an application filed by thatindividual. A IV-D agency may close a case in which the custodial parentmoves from the State only if the case meets one of the criteria enumeratedin paragraph (b) of this section, or when the State is aware that the custodialparent has applied for services in another State. 1. <T3>60-Day Notice of Closing To Custodial Parent_andSection; 303.11(c)_ Comment:</T3>We received a number of comments on this provision. Some commentersfelt that such a provision would mean that custodial parents would be entitledto a hearing during the 60-day period to contest the closure. Other commenterswondered why such a 60-day notice was given unless the custodial parenthad a chance to contest. Other commenters felt the 60-day period was toolong when compared to the case processing timeframes the State must meet.<T3>Response: </T3>We have retained the 60-day notice requirement, butadded that the custodial parent may, during that time, request that thecase be kept open upon the presentation of new information which constituteschanged circumstances or when contact with the custodial parent has beenreestablished in certain non-AFDC cases. We believe that hearings wouldnot be justified in these cases because the criteria clearly limits thecircumstances qualifying for closure, and the custodial parent's opportunityto provide new information will ensure that all cases with potential willbe worked. Conversely, there is no absolute right to IV-D services wherebasic information is lacking. m. <T3>Retention of Records for Three Years</T3>_1. <T3>Comment: </T3>One State asked if, instead of destroying case filesafter one year it could archive such records, and an organization suggestedthat files be retained indefinitely on microfiche and not destroyed. <T3>Response: </T3>As stated earlier, none of the case closure criteriarequires the States to take any action if a State decides, under its owncriteria, to work or archive cases. The requirement for retaining all recordsfor cases closed for a period of three years is a Federal provision at45 CFR Part 74, Subpart D. This is a minimum requirement and States maychoose to retain records for a longer period, as discussed above. Statesmay want to consider maintaining some type of minimal case record filebeyond the 3-year requirement when the IV-D agency closes an active AFDCcase. Minimal Organizational and Staffing Requirements_Section 303.20 <ITAG tagnum="81">a. Organizational Structure and Sufficient Resources_andSection; 303.20(c)</ITAG>1. <T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters felt that this requirement was a criticalprovision which could be used by State and local jurisdictions to allocateresources and review priorities in a manner which could be most beneficialto the child support enforcement program. Other commenters, while supportiveof the overall intention of this provision, felt that OCSE should eitherestablish standards for staffing and resources just as it did for Stateperformance standards, or provide specific guidance on how States and localitiesshould allocate resources.<T3>Response:</T3> We believe that States and localities should establishspecific resource or staffing standards. As we emphasized in the preambleto the proposed regulations, this requirement has never been quantifiedas a national standard. Therefore, while we believe that it is highly beneficialfor IV-D programs to establish such standards, OCSE is not establishinguniversal standards in this regulation because there are factors whichare unique to each State or locality. OCSE will, however, continue to providetechnical assistance and disseminate relevant information pertaining toresource or staffing standards. 2. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several commenters recommended that OCSE commission anew study which would take into consideration the increased staffing requirementswhich States would need to meet in complying with the timeframes establishedin the standards for program operations. <T3>Response: </T3> OCSE believes that a study of this type is not relevantto the issues at hand. Any study would, by necessity, be focused on a nationalbase which would not be relevant to specific State and local circumstancesand organizational differences. Moreover, simply focusing on staffing requirementsignores the need, attested to by program reviews and program audits, tocarefully reassess organizational structures, work process flows, policiesand procedures, priorities and other facets of program management thatgo well beyond just the number of employees assigned to a task. 3. <T3>Comment:</T3> Several States felt that this requirement signaled ashift in Federal priorities by emphasizing procedural and organizationalstandards to the detriment of results-oriented policies previously establishedthrough incentive payments and emphasis on cost/benefit ratios. Some commenterssuggested that OCSE revise its incentive formulas to take into accountthat performance as measured by increased collections is no longer a priority.One locality complained that the Federal requirement would force the doublingof staff providing IV-D services. <T3>Response:</T3> The requirements of this section are designed, in part,to correct problems in State and local operations identified by both thepreviously cited GAO report and OCSE program reviews and audits. One ofthe conclusions which can be drawn from these reports is that many Statesand localities were not effective in either establishing paternity or establishingand enforcing support orders. The requirements at issue do not signal a shift in priority; from its inceptionin 1975, the focus of the Child Support Enforcement program has been toestablish paternity and to collect support. When States are not in substantialcompliance with standards for program operations, it is incumbent uponthe Federal government to stimulate effective and prompt remedial action.To do otherwise is to ignore both the pressing need for vigorous childsupport enforcement and allow a perpetuation of the operational deficienciesfound in examinations of State and local program performance. <ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291 </ITAG><T3>Comment:</T3> We received several comments with regard to the statementin the preamble that this rule does not constitute a ``major'' rule. Commentersbelieved that it is a major rule because it is likely to result in a majorincrease in costs for State government agencies. Many commenters were opposedto the statement that States should reallocate existing resources to concentrateefforts on child support enforcement because a transfer of funds wouldcripple the losing program and be in conflict with employees' union contracts.Commenters requested that we submit the regulation for review under ExecutiveOrder 12291. <T3>Response:</T3> Given the fact that we have extended the timeframesfor action in the final rule, we do not believe that implementation ofthis regulation would require a sufficient increase in staff to necessitatethe transfer of resources from other programs to IV-D programs unless aState or local jurisdiction, on its own initiative, decided to proceedin this manner. Moreover, the financing structure of the IV-D program itselfmakes it a very profitable enterprise for State and local government, withgreat potential to expand upon the direct payoff to government and thecost avoidance value of the program even if an infusion of resources isrequired to enhance operational performance. We believe that the revisedstandards and timeframes are within the grasp of any well-managed IV-Dagency. However, recognizing that substantial resources will be neededto implement these new standards, we have prepared a Regulatory ImpactAnalysis (see section below).<ITAG tagnum="84">Economic Impact </ITAG>The Child Support Enforcement program was established under title IV-Dof the Act by the Social Services Amendments of 1974, for the purposesof enforcing the support obligations owed by absent parents to their children,locating absent parents, establishing paternity and obtaining child support.The IV-D program collected some $4.7 billion in FY 1988_over $1.5 billionon behalf of children receiving AFDC and the remainder on behalf of childrennot receiving AFDC. State and local expenditures amounted to $1.2 billion.Collections for AFDC families, after a $50 disregard, are used to offsetthe costs of assistance payments made to such families. The intent of thisfinal regulation is to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of IV-Dprograms. Because this final rule strengthens and clarifies existing programoperations regulations, it is expected that State performance will improveand cases will be worked more effectively. It is expected that any increasein administrative costs will be more than offset by an increase in collections.The principal impact of the regulation will be on State operations. Stateexpenditures may increase initially; however, we believe that the increasewill be more than offset by the increase in collections and by the avoidanceof governmental assistance costs that would otherwise be incurred and therefore,a net savings to State governments will result. <ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291 </ITAG>In accordance with Executive Order 12291, we are required to prepare aRegulatory Impact Analysis for any ``major'' rule. A major rule is onethat is likely to result in: (1) An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more: (2) A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographic regions; or(3) Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.This rule meets none of these criteria with the possible exception of anannual effect on the economy of $100 million or more. Although the fiscaleffects of this rule cannot be predicted with precision, and depend onindividual State implementation decisions, it is possible that administrativecosts will rise by $100 million or more within the five-year period thatwe use for analyzing impacts, and likely that AFDC collections will riseby several hundred million dollars annually. Therefore, although the neteffect of the rule on both States and society will be positive, we haveprepared the following analysis which, together with the remainder of thispreamble, meets the requirements of E.O. 12291. The rule establishes performance standards for processing child supportcases. Most of these standards contribute directly or indirectly to increasingthe speed or likelihood of payment of child support. Most of them do notinherently require additional resources to administer, either because theyaffect the timing rather than the amount of work, or because the deadlinesinvolved require changes rather than increases in resource use (e.g., changeinternal State procedures for accessing records to provide more timelyresponse). And some can reduce administrative costs, depending on how implemented.Nonetheless, these standards will increase the number of cases successfullyresulting in payment of support obligations, and therefore will necessarilyentail additional costs for the work performed on cases which would nototherwise have been successfully handled. In particular, we do not expectthat a State with large numbers of cases per caseworker will be able tocomply with these rules without an increase in caseworker staff. The real challenge this rule presents most States is the need to reviewand in many cases radically change existing bureaucratic procedures. Forexample, a State which relies on sequential, totally manual, multi-agencytransfer and review procedures for tracking payments and issuing checkswill have difficulty meeting the 15-day deadline for payments to familieseven if it adds substantial clerical resources to each stage of the process.Substantial changes in handling distribution of collections, service ofprocess, access of data bases used for location of absent parents, andother cross-agency functions and procedures may be needed in many States.As discussed in detail elsewhere in this preamble, we considered numerousalternatives and made substantial changes in these standards form thoseoriginally proposed. In reaching decisions on the final standards we soughtto maximize State flexibility wherever possible. For example, we decidedto replace a number of more detailed location standards with an ``umbrella''standard requiring accessing all appropriate location sources within 75calendar days. In devising each standard we considered all comments andother information on feasibility and in every case imposed a standard whichwas clearly implementable at reasonable cost in a well-managed program.Any reasonable standards would necessarily require most States to reviewand revise procedures. Of course, nothing in this rule dictates the precise methods by which Statesachieve these standards. To the contrary, we are well aware that each Statehas unique administrative structures and implementation procedures now,and expect that future solutions will be almost equally diverse. We havesought to provide maximum flexibility for each State to devise whateverchanges it finds most cost-effective. A final issue concerns timing. As discussed elsewhere in this preamble,we believe Congress did not intend the effective date of this regulationto be inordinately delayed. However, while the effective date of theserequirements is October 1, 1990, we extended or revised many of the proposedtimeframes to take into consideration the concerns and alternative timeframessuggested by many States. Regardless, States have known for many yearsthat reforms were needed, have known for almost a year that changes wouldhave to be made under the Family Support Act requirements, and have morethan a year to initiate actions to meet the specific requirements of thisfinal rule. While the requirements are effective on October 1, 1990, inreality, States have time after that date to fine-tune State processesand avoid paying fiscal penalties. A State would not pay a penalty forfailing to substantially comply with the new requirements until, at theearliest, the beginning of FY 1993. If however, the State took correctiveaction in accordance with Federal requirements within a year of notificationof non-compliance, the State would pay no penalty at all. We suggested in the preamble to the NPRM, purely as an example, that transfersof staff from other functions and agencies was one approach that some Statesmight consider to expedite augmenting child support functions (other optionsinclude recruitment of new staff, use of contract assistance to clear upbacklogs, etc.). To the extent that long lead times are needed (e.g., toplan and implement ADP systems) States can also consider systems whichcan be implemented more rapidly and leave more ambitious systems for futureyears. In this regard, this Department commits itself to reviewing requiredADP plans with the greatest possible speed, taking into account the deadlinesthese standards impose. The case closure criteria contained in andSection; 303.9 should result inimproved performance of State IV-D agencies because they will ensure thatavailable resources are focused on IV-D cases in which there is a potentialfor paternity establishment and support order establishment and enforcement.They will allow States to close unworkable cases and improve the managementof their caseloads. Increased efforts focused on workable cases shouldresult in increased collections, greater avoidance of governmental assistancecosts and commensurate savings to the State and Federal governments. In summary, whatever the unavoidable effect of this rule on administrativeprocesses, an effect which each State has maximum flexibility to determine,it has a net beneficial impact on State budgets. Like the overall program,which returns States in excess of $380 million annually (through reductionsin AFDC payments, Federal matching of administrative costs, and Federalincentive matching) in excess of administrative costs, the increase ofchild support payments made is likely to return through AFDC collectionsalone more than double the amount spent on processing cases. States willretain most of this increment. Therefore, the net effects of this rulewill not only be financially beneficial to States, but will simultaneouslyimprove the operation of child support enforcement from every perspective,including especially that of beneficiaries of increased and more timelychild support payments.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG>The Secretary certifies, under 5 U.S.C. 605(b), as enacted by the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (Pub. L. 96-354), that this regulation will not resultin a significant impact on a substantial number of small entities. Theprimary impact is on State governments and individuals, which are not consideredsmall entities under the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Lists of Subjects</ITAG>45 CFR Part 232Aid to families with dependent children, Child support, Grant programs_socialprograms.45 CFR Parts 301, 303 and 304Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Penalties, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.45 CFR Part 302Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Penalties, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements, Unemployment compensation.45 CFR Part 306Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Medicaid, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.45 CFR Part 307Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Computer technology, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program No. 13.783, ChildSupport Enforcement Program.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: July 14, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Catherine Bertini,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Office of Child Support Enforcement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: July 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis W. Sullivan,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, 45 CFR Parts 232, 301 through304, 306 and 307 are amended as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 232_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 232 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 1302.</ITAG>2. Section 232.20(d) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 232.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Treatment of child support collections made in the Child Support EnforcementProgram as income and resources in the Title IV-A Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) The State plan must provide that the IV-A agency, on behalf of theIV-D agency, will send to the family the sum disregarded under andSection;302.51(b)(1) within 20 calendar days of the date of initial receipt inthe State of the first $50 of support collected in a month, or, if lessthan $50 is collected in a month, within 20 calendar days of the end ofthe month in which the support was collected.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 301_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 301 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 664, 666, 667, 1302,1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p) and 1396k.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 301.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>2. Section 301.1 is amended by removing the paragraph designations; bymoving the definitions of ``Medicaid agency'' and ``Medicaid'' which arecurrently in andSection; 306.1(b) and (c); by moving the definition of ``Politicalsubdivision'' which is currently in andSection; 303.52(a); and placing thedefinitions in alphabetical order. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 302_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 302 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 664, 666, 667, 1302,1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p), and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Section 302.32 is amended by the revising the title and first sentenceof paragraph (b) and adding paragraph (f) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Collection and distribution of support payments by the IV-D agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) The IV-D agency must inform the State's IV-A agency of the amount ofthe collection which represents payment on the required support obligationfor the month as determined in andSection; 302.51(a) within 10 working daysof the end of the month in which the support is received by the IV-D agencyresponsible for final distribution. * * * <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) <T3>Timeframes for distribution of support payments.</T3> (1) In interstateIV-D cases, amounts collected by the responding State on behalf of theinitiating State must be forwarded to the initiating State within 15 calendardays of the initial point of receipt in the responding State, in accordancewith andSection; 303.7(c)(7)(iv). (2) Amounts collected by the IV-D agency on behalf of recipients of aidunder the State's title IV-A or IV-E plan for whom an assignment underandSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17) of the Act is effectiveshall be distributed as follows: (i) when the IV-D agency sends payments to the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(1)of this part, payments to the family must be sent to the family within15 calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State of the first$50 of support collected in a month, or, if less than $50 is collectedin a month, within 15 calendar days of the end of the month in which thesupport was collected. When the IV-A agency sends payments to the familyunder andSection; 302.51(b)(1) of this part, the IV-D agency must forwardany amount due the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) to the IV-A agencywithin 15 calendar days of the date of initial receipt in the State ofthe first $50 of support collected in a month, or, if less than $50 iscollected in a month, within 15 calendar days of the end of the month inwhich the support was collected. (ii) Except as specified under paragraph (f)(2)(iv) of this section, collectionsfor the month after the month the family receives its last assistance paymentand collections distributed under andSection; 302.51(b)(3) and (5) of thispart must be sent to the family within 15 calendar days of the date ofinitial receipt in the State of a collection for the first month of ineligibility.(iii) Except as specified in paragraph (f)(2)(iv) of this section, collectionsin IV-E foster care cases under andSection;andSection; 302.52(b)(2) and (4)of this part must be distributed within 15 calendar days of the date ofinitial receipt in the State. (iv) Collections as a result of Federal or State income tax refund offsetpaid to the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(5) of this part, or distributedin title IV-E foster care cases under andSection; 302.52(b)(4) of this part,must be sent to the AFDC family or IV-E agency, as appropriate, within30 calendar days of the date of initial receipt by the IV-D agency, unlessState law requires a post-offset appeal process and an appeal is filedtimely, in which case the IV-D agency must send any payment to the AFDCfamily or IV-E agency within 15 calendar days of the date the appeal isresolved. (3) Amounts collected on behalf of individuals receiving services underandSection; 302.33 of this part shall be distributed as follows: (i) Amounts collected which represent payment on the current support obligationshall be sent to the family within 15 calendar days of the date of initialreceipt in the State. (ii) Except as specified in paragraph (f)(3)(iii) of this section, if theamount collected is more than the amount required to be distributed inparagraph (f)(3)(i) of this section, the State may at its discretion eithersend such amounts to the family to satisfy past-due support within 15 calendardays of the date of initial receipt in the State or retain such amountsas have been assigned to satisfy assistance paid to the family which hasnot been reimbursed. (iii) Collections due the family under andSection; 302.51(b)(5) as a resultof Federal or State income tax refund offset must be sent to the familywithin 30 calendar days of the date of receipt in the IV-D agency, except:(A) If State law requires a post-offset appeal process and an appeal istimely filed, in which case the IV-D agency must send any payment to thefamily within 15 calendar days of the date the appeal is resolved; or (B) As provided in andSection; 303.72(h)(5) of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>3. Section 302.51 is amended by changing all references to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.12''; by removing the last sentence ``In anycase in which collections are received by an entity other than the agencyresponsible for final distribution under this section, the entity musttransmit the collection within 10 days of receipt.'' in paragraph (a);and by removing the sentence ``This payment shall be made in the monthfollowing the month in which the amount of the collection was used to redetermineeligibility for an assistance payment under the State's title IV-A plan.''in paragraphs (b)(3) and (5). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>4. Section 302.55 is amended by changing reference to ``andSection; 303.52''to ``andSection; 304.12'' and the reference to ``andSection; 303.52(d)'' to``andSection; 303.52.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>5. Section 302.80 is amended by removing the words ``Subpart A of'' inparagraph (a) and replacing the words ``Subpart B of Part 306'' in paragraph(b) with the words ``andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31''. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 303_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 303 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 663, 664, 666, 667,1302, 1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p) and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Part 303 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.0 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>a. Section 303.0 is amended by removing the words ``effective July 1, 1975;''in paragraph (a).   b. Section 303.2 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of cases and maintenance of case records. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency must: (1) Make applications for child support services readily accessible tothe public; (2) When an individual requests an application or IV-D services, providean application to the individual on the day the individual makes a requestin person or send an application to the individual within no more than5 working days of a written or telephone request. Information describingavailable services, the individual's rights and responsibilities, and theState's fees, cost recovery and distribution policies must accompany allapplications for services and must be provided to AFDC, Medicaid and titleIV-E foster care applicants or recipients within no more than 5 workingdays of referral to the IV-D agency; and (3) Accept an application as filed on the day it and the application feeare received. An application is a written document provided by the Statewhich indicates that the individual is applying for child support enforcementservices under the State's title IV-D program and is signed by the individualapplying for IV-D services. (b) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must, within nomore than 20 calendar days of receipt of referral of a case or filing ofan application for services under andSection; 302.33, open a case by establishinga case record and, based on an assessment of the case to determine necessaryaction: (1) Solicit necessary and relevant information from the custodial parentand other relevant sources and initiate verification of information, ifappropriate; and (2) If there is inadequate location information to proceed with the case,request additional information or refer the case for further location attempts,as specified in andSection; 303.3. (c) The case record must be supplemented with all information and documentspertaining to the case, as well as all relevant facts, dates, actions taken,contacts made and results in a case.c. Section 303.3 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Location of absent parents. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Definition. </T3>``Location'' means information concerning the physicalwhereabouts of the absent parent, or the absent parent's employer(s), othersources of income or assets, as appropriate, which is sufficient and necessaryto take the next appropriate action in a case. (b) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must attempt tolocate all absent parents or sources of income and/or assets when locationis necessary to take necessary action. Under this standard, the IV-D agencymust: (1) Use appropriate location sources such as the Federal PLS; interstatelocation networks; local officials and employees administering public assistance,general assistance, medical assistance, food stamps and social services(whether such individuals are employed by the State or a political subdivision);relatives and friends of the absent parent; current or past employers;the local telephone company; the U.S. Postal Service; financial references;unions; fraternal organizations; and police, parole, and probation recordsif appropriate; and State agencies and departments, as authorized by Statelaw, including those departments which maintain records of public assistance,wages and employment, unemployment insurance, income taxation, driver'slicenses, vehicle registration, and criminal records; (2) Establish working relationships with all appropriate agencies in orderto utilize locate resources effectively; (3) Within no more than 75 calendar days of determining that location isnecessary, access all appropriate location sources, including transmittingappropriate cases to the Federal PLS, and ensure that location informationis sufficient to take the next appropriate action in a case;(4) Refer appropriate cases to the IV-D agency of any other State, in accordancewith the requirements of andSection; 303.7 of this Part. The IV-D agencyof such other State shall follow the procedures in paragraphs (b)(1) through(5) of this section for such cases, as necessary, except that the respondingState is not required to access the Federal PLS under paragraph (b)(3)of this section; (5) Repeat location attempts in cases in which previous attempts to locateabsent parents or sources of income and/or assets have failed, but adequateidentifying and other information exists to meet requirements for submittalfor location, either quarterly or immediately upon receipt of new informationwhich may aid in location, whichever occurs sooner. Quarterly attemptsmay be limited to automated sources but must include accessing State employmentsecurity files. Repeated attempts because of new information which mayaid in location must meet the requirements of paragraph (b)(3) of thissection; and (6) Submit to the Federal PLS at least annually cases in which locationis needed and previous attempts to locate have failed and which meet therequirements for submittal. (c) The State must establish guidelines defining diligent efforts to serveprocess. These guidelines must include periodically repeating service ofprocess attempts in cases in which previous attempts to serve process havefailed, but adequate identifying and other information exists to attemptservice of process.d. The introductory text of andSection; 303.4 is republished and the sectionis amended by adding new paragraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of support obligations.  </ITAG>For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for services underandSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) Within 90 calendar days of locating an absent parent or of establishingpaternity, establish an order for support, or complete service of processnecessary to commence proceedings to establish a support order (or documentunsuccessful attempts to serve process, in accordance with the State'sguidelines defining diligent efforts under andSection; 303.3(c)). (e) If the court or administrative authority dismisses a petition for asupport order without prejudice, the IV-D agency must, at the time of dismissal,examine the reasons for dismissal and determine when it would be appropriateto seek an order in the future, and seek a support order at that time.e. Section 303.5 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (c) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of paternity. </ITAG>(a) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter in which paternity has not yet beenestablished: (1) The IV-D agency must, within no more than 90 calendar days of locatingthe alleged father, file for paternity establishment or complete serviceof process to establish paternity (or document unsuccessful attempts toserve process, in accordance with the State's guidelines defining diligentefforts under andSection; 303.3(c)), whichever occurs later in accordancewith State procedures for paternity establishment. (2) Paternity must be established or the alleged father excluded as a resultof genetic tests and/or legal process within one year of the later of: (i) Successful service of process; or, (ii) The child reaching 6 months of age. (3) In any case where an alleged father is excluded but more than one allegedfather has been identified, the IV-D agency must meet the requirementsset forth in paragraph (a)(1) and (2) of this section for each allegedfather identified. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The IV-D agency must identify and use through competitive procurementlaboratories which perform, at reasonable cost, legally and medically acceptablegenetic tests which tend to identify the father or exclude the allegedfather. The IV-D agency must make available a list of such laboratoriesto appropriate courts and law enforcement officials, and to the publicupon request.f. Section 303.6 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Enforcement of support obligations. </ITAG>For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for services underandSection; 302.33 in which the obligation to support and the amount of theobligation have been established, the IV-D agency must maintain and usean effective system for: (a) Monitoring compliance with the support obligation; (b) Identifying on the date the parent fails to make payments in an amountequal to the support payable for one month, or on an earlier date in accordancewith State law, those cases in which there is a failure to comply withthe support obligation; and (c) Enforcing the obligation by: (1) Initiating income withholding, in accordance with andSection; 303.100;or (2) Taking any appropriate enforcement action (except income withholdingand Federal and State income tax refund offset) unless service of processis necessary, within no more than 30 calendar days of identifying a delinquencyor other support-related non-compliance with the order or the locationof the absent parent, whichever occurs later. If service of process isnecessary prior to taking an enforcement action, service must be completed(or unsuccessful attempts to serve process must be documented in accordancewith the State's guidelines defining diligent efforts under andSection; 303.3(c)),and enforcement action taken if process is served, within no later than60 calendar days of identifying a delinquency or other support-relatednon-compliance with the order, or the location of the absent parent, whicheveroccurs later; (3) Submitting once a year all cases which meet the certification requirementsunder andSection; 303.102 of this part and State guidelines developed underandSection; 302.70(b) of this title for State income tax refund offset, andwhich meet the certification requirements under andSection; 303.72 of thispart for Federal income tax refund offset; and (4) In cases in which enforcement attempts have been unsuccessful, at thetime an attempt to enforce fails, examining the reason the enforcementattempt failed and determining when it would be appropriate to take anenforcement action in the future, and taking an enforcement action in accordancewith the requirements of this section at that time. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>g. Section 303.7 is amended by adding the word ``working'' between thewords ``10'' and ``days'' in paragraphs (a)(2), (b)(5), and (c)(5), (6)and (9); replacing the word ``promptly'' with the words ``within 20 calendardays of determining that the absent parent is in another State'' in paragraph(b)(2); adding the word ``calendar'' between the words ``30'' and ``days''in paragraph (b)(4); and replacing the word ``60'' with the words ``90calendar'' in paragraph (c)(4); adding the word ``calendar'' between thewords ``90'' and ``days'' in paragraph (b)(6).h. The introductory text of andSection; 303.10(b) is republished and andSection;303.10 is amended by revising paragraphs (a), (b)(5) and (b)(6) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for case assessment and prioritization. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency may implement a case assessment and prioritizationsystem Statewide or in a particular political subdivision of the Stateto manage its caseload. If a IV-D agency implements a case assessment andprioritization system, the IV-D agency must continue to meet the timeframesand case processing standards contained in this Part. (b) In implementing a case assessment and prioritization system, the IV-Dagency must: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(5) Prioritize cases after reviewing all intake information for accuracyand completeness and, if review indicates that additional information isneeded, prioritize only after attempting to verify or secure the informationin accordance with andSection; 303.2. (6) Establish a mechanism for the periodic review of low priority casesin accordance with the standards set forth in part 303, and for notifyingthe custodial parent in these cases that new information may result ina higher priority for the case.i. A new andSection; 303.11 entitled ``Case closure criteria'' is added toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Case closure criteria. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency shall establish a system for case closure. (b) In order to be eligible for closure, the case must meet at least oneof the following criteria: (1) In the case of a child who has reached the age of majority, there isno longer a current support order and arrearages are under $500 or unenforceableunder State law; (2) In the case of a child who has not reached the age of majority, thereis no longer a current support order and arrearages are under $500 or unenforceableunder State law; (3) The absent parent or putative father is deceased and no further action,including a levy against the estate, can be taken; (4) Paternity cannot be established because: (i) The child is at least 18 years old and action to establish paternityis barred by a statute of limitations which meets the requirements of andSection;302.70(a)(5) of this chapter; (ii) A genetic test or a court or administrative process has excluded theputative father and no other putative father can be identified; or (iii) In accordance with andSection; 303.5(b) of this part, the IV-D agencyhas determined that it would not be in the best interests of the childto establish paternity in a case involving incest or forcible rape, orin any case where legal proceedings for adoption are pending; (5) The absent parent's location is unknown, and the State has made regularattempts using multiple sources to locate the absent parent over a three-yearperiod, all of which have been unsuccessful; (6) The absent parent cannot pay support for the duration of the child'sminority because the parent has been institutionalized in a psychiatricfacility, is incarcerated with no chance for parole, or has a medically-verifiedtotal and permanent disability with no evidence of support potential. TheState must also determine that no income or assets are available to theabsent parent which could be levied or attached for support; (7) The absent parent is a citizen of, and lives in, a foreign country,does not work for the Federal government or a company with headquartersor offices in the United States, and has no reachable domestic income orassets; and the State has been unable to establish reciprocity with thecountry; (8) The IV-D agency has provided location-only services as requested underandSection; 302.35(c)(3) of this chapter; (9) The non-AFDC custodial parent requests closure of a case and thereis no assignment to the State of arrearages which accrued under a supportorder; (10) There has been a finding of good cause as set forth at andSection;andSection;302.31(c) and 232.40 through 232.49 of this chapter and the State or localIV-A or IV-E agency has determined that support enforcement may not proceedwithout risk or harm to the child or caretaker relative; (11) In a non-AFDC case, the IV-D agency is unable to contact the custodialparent within a 30 calendar day period despite attempts by both phone andat least one registered letter; or (12) In a non-AFDC case, the IV-D agency documents the circumstances ofthe custodial parent's noncooperation and an action by the custodial parentis essential for the next step in providing IV-D services. (c) In cases meeting the criteria in paragraphs (b) (1) through (7) and(11) and (12) of this section, the State must notify the custodial parentin writing 60 calendar days prior to closure of the case of the State'sintent to close the case. The case must be kept open if the custodial parentsupplies information in response to the notice which could lead to theestablishment of paternity or a support order or enforcement of an orderor, in the instance of paragraph (b)(11) of this section, if contact isreestablished with the custodial parent. If the case is closed, the custodialparent may request at a later date that the case be reopened if there isa change in circumstances which could lead to the establishment of paternityor a support order or enforcement of an order. (d) The IV-D agency must retain all records for cases closed pursuant tothis section for a minimum of three years, in accordance with 45 CFR Part74, Subpart D.j. Section 303.20 is amended by revising the introductory language in paragraph(c) and paragraph (c)(7) and adding new paragraph (g) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minimum organizational and staffing requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) There is an organizational structure and sufficient resources at theState and local level to meet the performance and time standards containedin this part and to provide for the administration or supervision of thefollowing support enforcement functions: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(7) <T3>Enforcement. </T3>Activities to enforce collection of support, includingincome withholding and other available enforcement techniques. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) If it is determined as a result of an audit conducted under Part 305of this chapter that a State is not in substantial compliance with therequirements of title IV-D of the Act, the Secretary will evaluate whetherinadequate resources was a major contributing factor and, if necessary,may set resource standards for the State.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated from andSection;andSection; 306.50 and 306.51 respectively]</ITAG>k. Section 306.50 is redesignated as a new andSection; 303.30 and andSection;306.51 is redesignated as a new andSection; 303.31.l. In andSection; 303.52, the definition of ``Political subdivision'' ismoved from paragraph (a) to andSection; 301.1 and andSection; 303.52 is revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pass-through of incentives to political subdivisions. </ITAG>The State must calculate and promptly pay incentives to political subdivisionsas follows: (a) The State IV-D agency must develop a standard methodology for passingthrough an appropriate share of its incentive payment to those politicalsubdivisions of the State that participate in the costs of the program,taking into account the efficiency and effectiveness of the activitiescarried out under the State plan by those political subdivisions. In orderto reward efficiency and effectiveness, the methodology also may providefor payment of incentives to other political subdivisions of the Statethat administer the program. (b) To ensure that the standard methodology developed by the State reflectslocal participation, the State  IV-D agency must submit a draft methodologyto participating political subdivisions for review and comment or use therulemaking process available under State law to receive local input. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.72 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>m. Section 303.72(g)(8) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.12''. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.73 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>n. Section 303.73(a)(1) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.7(a)(3)'' to ``andSection; 303.7''. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.100 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>o. Section 303.100 is amended by replacing the word ``immediately'' withthe words ``within 5 working days'' in paragraph (d)(2) and by removingthe word ``promptly'' after the word ``distributed'' in paragraph (e)(2).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>p. Section 303.101(b)(2) is amended by replacing the words ``from the timeof filing'' with ``from the time of successful service of process''. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>q. Section 303.102(g)(1) is amended by removing the words ``Within a reasonabletime period in accordance with State law,'' and capitalizing the word ``a''before the word ``State''. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 304_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation in Part 304, continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 655, 657, 1302, 1396a(a)(25),1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p), and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Part 304 is amended as follows:a. A new andSection; 304.12 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incentive payments. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For the purposes of this section: ``AFDC collections''means support collections satisfying an assigned support obligation underandSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17) of the Act, includingcollections treated in accordance with paragraph (b)(4)(ii) of this section.``Non-AFDC Collections'' means support collections, on behalf of individualsreceiving services under this title, satisfying a support obligation whichhas not been assigned under andSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17)of the Act, including collections treated in accordance with paragraph(b)(4)(ii) of this section and collections made under andSection;andSection;302.51(e) of this chapter. ``Total IV-D administrative costs'' means total IV-D administrative expendituresclaimed by a State in a specified fiscal year adjusted in accordance withparagraphs (b)(4)(iii), (b)(4)(iv) and (b)(4)(v) of this section. (b) <T3>Incentive payments to States. </T3>Effective October 1, 1985, the Officeshall compute incentive payments for States for a fiscal year in recognitionof AFDC collections and of non-AFDC collections. (1) A portion of a State's incentive payment shall be computed as a percentageof the State's AFDC collections, and a portion of the incentive paymentshall be computed as a percentage of its non-AFDC collections. The percentagesare determined separately for AFDC and non-AFDC portions of the incentive.The percentages are based on the ratio of the State's AFDC collectionsto the State's total administrative costs and the State's non-AFDC collectionsto the State's total administrative costs in accordance with the followingschedule:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Ratio of collections to total IV-D administrative costs</H1><H1>Percent of collection paid as an incentive</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Less than 1.4 <D>6.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.4 <D>6.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.6 <D>7.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.8 <D>7.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.0 <D>8.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.2 <D>8.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.4 <D>9.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.6 <D>9.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.8 <D>10.0</D></ITAG></ITAG>(2) The ratios of the State's AFDC and non-AFDC collections to total IV-Dadministrative costs will be truncated at one decimal place.(3) The portion of the incentive payment paid to a State for a fiscal yearin recognition of its non-AFDC collections is limited to the percentageof the portion of the incentive payment paid for that fiscal year in recognitionof its AFDC collections, as follows:(i) 100 percent in fiscal years 1986 and 1987;(ii) 105 percent in fiscal year 1988;(iii) 110 percent in fiscal year 1989; and(iv) 115 percent in fiscal year 1990 and thereafter.(4) In calculating the amount of incentive payments, the following conditionsapply:(i) Only those AFDC and non-AFDC collections distributed and expendituresclaimed by the State in the fiscal year shall be used to determine theincentive payment payable for that fiscal year;(ii) Support collected by one State on behalf of individuals receivingIV-D services in another State shall be treated as having been collectedin full by each State;(iii) Fees paid by individuals, recovered costs, and program income suchas interest earned on collections shall be deducted from total IV-D administrativecosts;(iv) At the option of the State, laboratory costs incurred in determiningpaternity may be excluded from total IV-D administrative costs; and(v) Effective January 1, 1990, amounts expended by the State in carryingout a special project under section 455(e) of the Act shall not be includedin the State's total IV-D administrative costs.(vi) Costs of demonstration projects for evaluating model procedures forreviewing child support awards under section 103(e) of Public Law 100-485shall not be included in the State's total IV-D administrative costs.(c)<T3> Payment of incentives.</T3> (1) The Office will estimate the totalincentive payment that each State will receive for the upcoming fiscalyear.(2) Each State will include one-quarter of the estimated total paymentin its quarterly collection report which will reduce the amount that wouldotherwise be paid to the Federal government to reimburse its share of assistancepayments under andSection;andSection; 302.51 and 302.52 of this chapter.(3) Following the end of a fiscal year, the Office will calculate the actualincentive payment the State should have received based on the reports submittedfor that fiscal year. If adjustments to the estimate made under paragraph(c)(1) of this section are necessary, the State's IV-A grant award willbe reduced or increased because of over- or under-estimates for prior quartersand for other adjustments.(4) For FY 1985, the Office will calculate a State's incentive paymentbased on AFDC collections retained by the State and paid to the familyunder andSection; 302.51(b)(1) of this chapter.(5) For FY 1986 and 1987, a State will receive the higher of the amountdue it under the incentive system and Federal matching rate in effect asof FY 1986 or 80 percent of what it would have received under the incentivesystem and Federal matching rate in effect during FY 1985.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>b. Section 304.20(b)(2) is amended by substituting the word ``genetic''for the word ``blood'' wherever it appears and changing the reference to``andSection; 303.5(b)'' to ``andSection; 303.5(c)''.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>c. Section 304.23(g) is amended by removing the words ``, Subpart A,''after the words ``Part 306''.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>d. Section 304.26(b) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.12''.Part 306 is amended by removing the heading of Subpart A, transferringthe definitions of ``Medicaid agency'' and ``Medicaid'' from andSection;306.1 to andSection; 301.1, transferring the contents of Subpart B_RequiredIV-D Activities, which consists of andSection;andSection; 306.50 and 306.51,to Part 303 and redesignating them as new andSection;andSection; 303.30 and303.31, respectively, and the part is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 306_OPTIONAL COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS FOR MEDICAL SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.0 Scope of this part. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.2 Cooperative agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.10 Functions to be performed under a cooperative agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.11 Administrative requirements of cooperative agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.20 Prior approval of cooperative agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.21 Subsidiary cooperative agreements with courts and law enforcementofficials. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.22 Purchase of service agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.30 Source of funds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 652, 1302, 1396a(a)(25), l396b(d)(2), 1396b(o),1396b(p), and 1396(k). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.0 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part. </ITAG>This part defines the requirements for an optional cooperative agreementbetween the IV-D agency and the Medicaid agency for the purpose of enforcingmedical support obligations under section 1912 of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperative agreement. </ITAG>The cooperative agreement between the IV-D agency and the Medicaid agencyshall be a written agreement for the IV-D agency to assist the Medicaidagency by securing and enforcing the medical support obligation of an absentparent to a child for whom an assignment of medical support rights hasbeen executed under 42 CFR 433.146. The functions that the IV-D agencymay perform under the cooperative agreement are set forth in andSection;306.10. The administrative requirements are set forth at andSection; 306.11.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Functions to be performed under a cooperative agreement. </ITAG>The functions that the IV-D agency may perform under a cooperative agreementwith the Medicaid agency are limited to one or any combination of the followingactivities. The agency may: (a) Receive referrals from the Medicaid agency. (b) Locate the absent parent, using the State Parent Locator Service andthe Federal Parent Locator Service, as needed. (c) Establish paternity if necessary. (d) Determine whether the parent has a health insurance policy or planthat covers the child. (e) Obtain sufficient information about the health insurance policy orplan to permit the filing of a claim with the insurer. (f) File a claim with the insurer; or transmit the necessary informationto the Medicaid agency, or to the appropriate State agency or fiscal agentfor the filing of the claim; or require the absent parent to file a claim.(g) Secure health insurance coverage through court or administrative order.(h) Take direct action against the absent parent to recover amounts necessaryto reimburse medical assistance payments when the absent parent does nothave health insurance and the amounts collected will not reduce the absentparent's ability to pay child support. (i) Receive medical support collections. (j) Distribute the collections as required by 42 CFR 433.154 includingcalculation and payment of the incentives provided for by 42 CFR 433.153.(k) Perform other functions as may be specified by instructions issuedby the Office of Child Support Enforcement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Administrative requirements of cooperative agreements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Organizational structure.</T3> The cooperative agreement must: (1) Describe the organizational structure of the unit or units within theIV-D agency that are responsible for medical support enforcement activities.(2) List the medical support enforcement functions that are to be performedoutside of the IV-D agency with the name of the organization responsiblefor performance. (3) Provide that the IV-D agency shall have responsibility for securingcompliance with the requirements of the cooperative agreement by individualsor agencies outside the IV-D agency performing medical support enforcementfunctions. (b) <T3>Maintenance of records.</T3> The cooperative agreement must specifythat the IV-D agency will establish and maintain case records of medicalsupport enforcement activities in accordance with the provisions of andSection;302.15 of this chapter. (c) <T3>Safeguarding information.</T3> The cooperative agreement must providethat the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for, orrecipients of, medical support enforcement services is subject to the limitationsin andSection; 303.21 of this chapter. (d) <T3>Fiscal policies and accountability.</T3> (1) The cooperative agreementmust provide that the IV-D agency will maintain an accounting system andsupporting fiscal records adequate to assure that claims for reimbursementfrom the Medicaid agency are in accordance with applicable Federal requirementsin 45 CFR Part 74. (2) The cooperative agreements must provide for the establishment of amethod for properly allocating those costs that cannot be directly chargedto the medical support enforcement effort. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Prior approval of cooperative agreements. </ITAG>(a) Prior to implementation, the IV-D agency must submit two copies ofany cooperative agreement entered into under this part to the RegionalRepresentative for approval. (b) The Regional Representative will review the cooperative agreement forconformity with the requirements of this part and 42 CFR 433.152. (c) The Regional Representative will promptly notify the State of approvalor disapproval. The State may consider the agreement approved if notificationis not received within 60 days after the agreement is received by the RegionalRepresentative. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Subsidiary cooperative agreements with courts and law enforcementofficials. </ITAG>The IV-D agency will enter into subsidiary written cooperative agreementswith appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to the extent necessaryto perform those functions specified in the cooperative agreement betweenthe IV-D agency and the Medicaid agency. These agreements must be madein accordance with the requirements of andSection; 302.34 (Cooperative agreements).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purchase of service agreements. </ITAG>The IV-D agency will enter into written purchase of service agreementsto the extent necessary to fulfill the requirements of its cooperativeagreement with the Medicaid agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Source of funds. </ITAG>The cooperative agreement must specify that the IV-D agency will receivefull reimbursement from the Medicaid agency for all medical support enforcementactivities performed under the agreement. (See andSection; 306.11(d) forrequirements on fiscal policies and accountability.) <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 307_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 307 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 652 through 658, 664, 666, 667 and 1302.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 307.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>2. Section 307.10 is amended by changing the reference in paragraph (a)(2)(xiii)to ``45 CFR part 306'' to ``andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31''.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-18178 Filed 8-1-89; 12:50 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>